Summary
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this good sized and well-presented three bedroom semi-detached property, situated on one of New Town's most desirable roads, providing excellent access to local schools, shops and amenities. For the ..."
-Prime development or investment opportunity near Colchester’s Town Centre -Large office building with extensive car parking. -0 5 miles from High Street extending to 1 56 acres. 
"**Portfolio Sale** Located in a prime position to the South of Colchester lies this excellent and rare opportunity to acquire 10 modern apartments in Ballantyne Drive, Hythe Quay, Colchester. Set within a popular modern development, within close proximity of the reputable University Of Essex a..."
"Introducing a luxurious 5-bedroom detached property, situated in the highly sought-after area of Lexden. This stunning property is the epitome of luxury living, boasting an array of impressive features that will take your breath away. As you enter the property, you are welcomed by a spac..."
"A handsome Victorian villa of grand proportions, which was formerly the residence of the Bishop of Colchester, located within the prestigious leafy residential neighbourhood of Lexden"
"Classical Georgian family home totalling approximately 3,225 sq ft in a prime position."
A handsome five bedroom unlisted family home with accommodation extending to around 3640 sq ft with ample secure parking.
"An extremely rare chance has arisen to purchase this magnificent five bedroom detached 3,500 square ft residence set in the heard of Old Lexden, currently being constructed by highly reputable local developers using traditional methods and with superb attention to detail.Internally you ..."
"An immaculate four bedroom, three storey town house which has been subject to a comprehensive refurbishment programme from opulent bathrooms to a contemporary bespoke kitchen"
"Built by award-winning Oak Home Developments, The Croft is an exclusive gated development of just five 4 & 5 bedroom luxury detached homes in sought after Braiswick, Colchester."
"Part of our Signature collection, this bespoke gated development of just eight contemporary detached homes was designed by award-winning local architects, Stanley Bragg. Built by Seven Developments to a high standard with excellent attention to detail, located on the edge of Colchester."
"Part of our Signature collection, a bespoke gated development of just eight contemporary 4-bedroom detached homes designed by award-winning local architects, Stanley Bragg. Built by Seven Developments to a high standard with excellent attention to detail, located on the outskirts of Colchester."
"Believed to be the former residence of the local carriage maker, occupying impressive grounds of over a 3rd of an acre is the is fine early c19th II four storey gault brick Regency town house with two excellent outbuildings"
"An exceptionally well-presented five-bedroom (two en-suite) detached neo-Victorian style individual property offering 2,475 sq ft of accommodation with three ground-floor reception spaces and further benefitting from a detached double garage, ample private parking and enclosed gardens. Great acce..."
"A substantial home which was modernised and extended in 2021. Featuring an indoor swimming pool, two large garages, a landscaped rear garden and an impressive open-plan kitchen living space. Located on a quiet private drive."
"Nestled in one of Colchester's most desirable districts Braiswick, within striking distance of Colchester's reputable golf club and also within close proximity of it's mainline station, offering direct links to London Liverpool Street Station within the hour, this executive four bedroom detach..."
"Early viewing is advised of this HMO investment opportunity, conveniently situated in the Hythe area of Colchester, close to Hythe Station. The property benefits from 11 bedsits and currently has 11 tenants living at the property. The property benefits from rear garden and communal washing room."
"A stunning Grade II* Listed Georgian fronted townhouse in the heart of Colchester’s historic centre. This stunning Grade II* Listed house dates from the 17th and 18th Century, being part timber framed with a red brick facade. Main entry is a central pedimented door case with ion..."
"Trinity Townhouse is located in Trinity Street, which consists of a range of fashionable clothing boutiques, numerous tea rooms, the local library, and small specialist shops. The house itself has at various times been used as offices, an art gallery, a doctors surgery and now serves as a trul..."
"This beautifully presented family home resides on one of Colchester’s most sought-after roads, which offers direct access to both the A12 and the North Station and is also within walking distance to many private and public schools of high regard. This spacious residence has undergone a complete t..."
"This particular property is situated to the north of Colchester, close to good primary and secondary schooling and with shopping facilities for day to day needs nearby. There is good access to the A12/A120 interchange leading to London M25 and A14 to the north. Colchester General Hospital is a..."
"Boydens are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented five-bedroom detached residence situated in the highly sought after Lexden area to the West of Colchester. Built in the 1960’s, the property was substantially extended in the 1970’s and now offers an overall floor area of approxi..."
"A rare opportunity to purchase an exceptionally beautiful home in the popular village of Braiswick. There is easy access to both the A12 and mainline railway which gets you to London in under an hour. Within a short walk of the property, there are a wealth of amenities, including golf clubs and a..."
"Originally constructed in 2018 and tucked away just off Ipswich Road down a private lane, a chance to acquire this executive detached residence with accommodation arranged over three floors. The property is conveniently situated for the main A12 trunk road, A120 and Severalls Business Park; bene..."
This has to be the biggest house and plot for this budget in CO4 !! Not only that but it is beautifully presented and chain free. Need room to grow? Could you extend/develop if needed? (STPP) Click or call to view before it goes
"***GUIDE PRICE £180,000*** One bedroom cluster house - Located in the popular area of Highwoods, offering convenient access to local amenities as well as the A12."
"A show stopping and imposing example of a four bedroom semi-detached Victorian bay-fronted residence, commanding a superior position within Lexden - arguably Colchester's most desired postcode location. Positioned within striking distance of Colchester Royal Grammar School and a variety of exc..."
A very rare opportunity to purchase this unique Arts and Crafts home described by well renowned author Nikolaus Pevsner as ''Voysey style''
"OPEN HOUSE SATURDAY 1ST APRIL. 2.30 - 4.00pm. CALL TO SECURE YOUR VIEWING. FOUR / FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE ON A 0.25 ACRE (STS) PLOT WITH ENTERTAINMENT BARN. The Nook was built in 1926 on an old orchard and took it's name from the shape of the plot it was built on with a large, sheltered a..."
"The Appleton is located on a QUIET CUL-DE-SAC and boasts a SOUTH FACING GARDEN, Large OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING area with a UTILITY and double doors leading to the SEPARATE LIVING ROOM with FEATURE FIREPLACE and WOOD BURNER. The MASTER BEDROOM has an EN-SUITE and FITTED WARDROBE also in bedroom two.."
"This four bedroom executive detached home is nestled in a quiet cul de sac off of the highly sought after Eastwood Drive, itself located in the popular Highwoods area of North Colchester. The properties location provides excellent access to local amenities, the Gilberd School, A12, General Hospi..."
"The Appleton is located on a QUIET CUL-DE-SAC and boasts a SOUTH FACING GARDEN, Large OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING area with a UTILITY and double doors leading to the SEPARATE LIVING ROOM with FEATURE FIREPLACE and WOOD BURNER. The MASTER BEDROOM an"
"An executive four bedroom detached family home offering spacious living accommodation with approximate 0.24 acre plot, on this popular development close to The Gilberd secondary school, A12 and North station and The General Hospital."
"Guide price £725,000-£750,000. An exceptional *DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE* is well-presented throughout offering *SUBSTANTIAL ACCOMMODATION*. Situated in this *EXCLUSIVE CUL-DE-SAC OFF EASTWOOD DRIVE* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
The Chiltern features a delightful OPEN PLAN kitchen/breakfast area with dual aspect windows and FRENCH DOORS leading out into the spacious GARDEN. There is also large dual aspect living room with another set of French doors to the garden. The impressive Master bedroom has a DOUBLE FITTED WARDROBE..
"**GUIDE PRICE £700,000 - £725,000** Constructed in the 19th Century, and occupying a third of an acre, Mill Paddock is a stunning, unique and incredibly spacious family home. Boasting picturesque views of the river Colne from the large, private and secluded rear garden this..."
"Located on highly sought-after Mill Road in Mile End, Colchester - this exceptional town house offers accommodation over three floors, comprising two reception rooms, kitchen, garden room, cloakroom, four bedrooms - with ensuite to principal - and family bathroom. The property also benefits from ..."
"Part of our Signature collection, a stunning conversion of a late Edwardian property into two semi-detached homes having been sympathetically refurbished retaining many original features and combining with contemporary aesthetics to provide light and airy living spaces. This wonderful property ha..."
"Located in the heart of Lexden is this stunning four bedroom, detached family home. The property is located within easy reach of good schools, transport routes, train stations and amenities. This would make a wonderful family home and viewing is highly advised. EPC C (Ref: COS230028)"
"Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this stunning, full of character bay fronted detached family home. Located in the heart of Lexden you are situated within easy reach of good schooling, transport routes, train stations and Colchester's Idyllic City Centre. The accommoda..."
"Occupied on a fantastic plot is this four bedroom, three bathroom detached house offering an abundance of potential set in the ever desirable location of Lexden. Upon entering, you are welcomed to a spacious entrance hall offering access to multiple rooms including a downstairs shower ro..."
"Including a OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA with handy utility, SEPARATE LIVING ROOM with FIREPLACE, BONUS ROOM ideal as a STUDY, DOUBLE FITTED WARDROBES to ALL BEDROOMS with an EN SUITE to the MASTER. TAKE THE VIRTUAL TOUR TODAY!"
"**100% PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE (PLUS MOVING COSTS - T&CS APPLY)** Layer Park, a sophisticated collection of contemporary new homes each crafted to cater to every aspect of 21st century living. Set on the peaceful yet well-connected border of Colchester, where this vibrant, thriving new cit..."
"A well presented TWO BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW with the benefit of a SEPARATE ONE BEDROOM DETACHED ANNEXE situated to the rear of the garden. The property is located in the ever popular Lexden area of Colchester, offering excellent access to the A12, city centre, train station, local shops and am..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £650,000 - £700,000 *** An outstanding family home located towards the North of Colchester which is approx. just over 2000 Square feet. The property offers a large driveway, double garage and four reception rooms as well as a stylish kitchen, cloak room and utility r..."
"***100% PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE PLUS MOVING COSTS***(subject to T&C's)***SHOW HOME OPEN***
***Contact our office for your appointment slot*** Layer Park, a sophisticated collection of contemporary new homes each crafted to cater to every aspect of 21st century living. Set on the peaceful yet..."
"VIEWING REFERENCE: MC0527 - Situated in the heart of Highwoods, Colchester is this wonderful four bedroom detached family home which boasts ample living space, excellent A12 access, local shops amenities & schooling situated nearby. 
"
"We are delighted to offer this beautifully presented 2 bedroom detached bungalow with separate 1 bedroom detached annexe on a large plot in the sought after Lexden area. Offering quick access to the A12, town centre, train station and local amenities, but tucked away in a quiet cul-de-sac, this h..."
Located in South Colchester is this surprisingly spacious three bedroom terraced home which benefits from having a conservatory extension as well as an en suite to the master bedroom
Introducing the Heritage Range of properties from Mersea Homes nestled in an area surrounded by open space and adjacent to protected woodland. The Harrier Heritage with upgraded specification will be a home like no other. Call to book your appointment with Amanda or Angela. 
"Detached 6-bed HMO currently with £44,400.00+ income P/A 2 en-suites 2 garages All rooms are full with professional tenants. Brand new boiler fitted with a 10-year guarantee. All rooms have solid oak furniture and everything is top quality. Floor 3- Bedroom 1 - 6.35x3.37m Bed..."
"The Grove at Chesterwell is a highly desirable collection of spacious 2,3 & 4 bedroom homes set in a beautifully landscaped surroundings and designed for countryside living. Please call Angela to make your appointment to view. OPEN WEEKEND JUST DROP IN"
"Hidden down a peaceful lane proudly sits this excellent three bedroom detached bungalow, boasting exceptional mature grounds, approaching an impressive 0.5acre (circa.) plot. Picturesque and offering an abundance of outdoor space, it's grounds are breath-taking and features a pond, whilst the ..."
Connells are pleased to present to market this beautiful four bedroom detached house in the sought after Highwoods area of Colchester.
"Set back from the road and positioned at the end of a private driveway is this three bedroom detached bungalow, ideally located within close proximity of good schooling, local shops and supermarkets, Tollgate retail park, A12/A120, excellent public transport links and easy access to ..."
"**Guide Price £600,000 - £625,000** The most exceptional example of an executive four bedroom detached residence, situated in the heart of the ever popular North-Colchester district 'St.Johns'. A truly stunning turn key home that has been designed with contemporary modern day livin..."
"Situated to the north of Colchester within easy access of great primary and secondary schooling is this modern five bedroom, three reception room, detached three storey house with detached double length garage, driveway and garden."
"This well presented, four bedroom detached family home is located on the west side of Colchester offering easy access to local shops, pubs, restaurants, A12/A120, popular schooling and within walking distance, you'll find Tollgate retail park. Marks Tey train station is not far, offering a com..."
"An executive four bedroom detached family home set back from Eastwood Drive offering well-presented good size living space throughout with a good size enclosed garden, detached double garage and ample off-road parking close to Highwoods Country Park and in the catchment area for Gilberd Secondary..."
"Echelon Walk is situated in the ever popular Whitmore Park development in Severalls and is conveniently located close to the A12, David Lloyd, Colchester's North Station and local amenities. In excess of 2400 sqft this stunning Edwardian property benefits from ample sash windows, creating a light..."
"** Guide Price £585,000 - £600,000 ** A delightfully positioned four bedroom detached house located off Church Lane, offering spacious accommodation and a mature slopping garden of around 90ft in depth."
This well-presented four bedroom detached family home occupies a prominent position on Lexden Road within walking distance to Crouch Street and the town.CHAIN FREE
"Occupying an enviable position on Lexden Road within close proximity of Colchester town centre is this fully refurbished four bedroom detached home with accommodation briefly comprising: Entrance hall, living room, separate dining room, kitchen, four bedrooms, family bathroom and separate w.c. ..."
"This brand new home features a DUAL ASPECT LIVING ROOM, study, open plan kitchen, dining and family room, utility room and en suites to bedrooms 1 and 2, plus a dressing area in bedroom 1. Outside you'll find a private garden, DRIVEWAY and GARAGE, plus an additional off-road parking space. "
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this exceptional *DETACHED BUNGALOW* is beautifully presented offering *GENEROUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* with early viewing absolutely essential. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHNS ESTATE* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SHOPS*, schools, bus routes and the A12/A120."
" A detached property offering stunning views of the Highwoods country park to the rear, five bedrooms, two reception rooms, a bathroom and a shower room."
"**Annex Potential** Words cannot describe how amazing this executive large 4-bedroom detached property is.
Located within easy access to town and station and with stunning views over the river.
This extensive home really does have the wow factor in every way starting with the views.
Once inside ..."
Boasting an enviable position on the ever popular Turner Rise Development is this handsome four bedroom detached home. Providing excellent access to North Station (direct links into London Liverpool Street) and Colchester General Hospital
"We are pleased to bring to the market this four bedroom detached home in the leafy area of Lexden. The property has been extended to the ground floor and offers good living accommodation although needing some modernisation. The property has a driveway for two cars, garage and gas central heatin..."
"**Guide Price £550,000** Purplebricks are delighted to present this delightful four bedroom period detached cottage, dating back to the late 1600s, set on a large sized plot, in the sought after west Colchester! Situated a short distance from Tollgate shopping centre which offers a varied rang..."
"This exceptional *FOUR/FIVE BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* offering *GENEROUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* and situated in an *EXCLUSIVE CUL-DE-SAC*, being ideal for local schools, Northern Gateway Leisure Park, Colchester General Hospital, North Station and the A12/A120."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Perfectly situated on the beautiful River Colne front sits this spacious, five bedroom terraced town house. Being set in a prestigious gated development of 24 houses this would be an ideal purchase for a growing family looking to nestle down in popular location. The spacious..."
"Guide Price: £550,000-£600,000 Positioned to the historical city of Colchester is this impressive Grade II listed four bedroom mid-terraced townhouse, sitting over three floors. Boasting a plethora of character and period features including exposed beams, sash windows, authentic cast iro..."
"***PLOT OF THE WEEK*** £499,995
***SHOW HOME OPEN***PART EXCHANGE AVAILABLE***
***CONTACT OUR OFFICE FOR APPOINTMENT SLOT***
Layer Park, a sophisticated collection of contemporary new homes each crafted to cater to every aspect of 21st century living. Set on the peaceful yet well-connected b..."
"Conveniently situated within the popular Stanway area, located to the west of Colchester. Stanway has everything you need for day-to-day living with Tollgate Retail Park and Stane Retail Park on your doorstep, with many well known high street brands including a Sainsbury's supermarket, Marks &..."
We are delighted to offer for sale this extended double-bay fronted detached family house situated in the sought after residential area of LEXDEN. The property is presented to the market in extremely good condition throughout and viewing is highly recommended. Benefits include GROUND FLOOR SHOW...
"***GUIDE PRICE OF £550,000 to £600,000***This Grade II listed four bedroom, town centre family residence forms part of Colchester's history, a truly aesthetically pleasing building, full of character, with views across Castle Park and the Castle itself. This particular home ..."
The Hingham boasts OPEN PLAN living in the KITCHEN and DINING AREA The open plan home features FRENCH DOORS to the garden from the living room and an adjoining utility room. Upstairs there's FOUR DOUBLE bedrooms. The Master has an EN-SUITE & a FITTED WARDROBES to find out more please contact us on..
"This attractive detached town house occupies an excellent location within easy reach of the A12, Colchester General Hospital and mainline railway station with straightforward links to London's Liverpool Street Station. the centre of Colchester is within a comfortable driving distance wit..."
"Occupying a private position on a popular new development in the Colchester district of Stanway is this beautifully presented executive four bedroom detached family home. The property boasts ample living accommodation throughout, a private rear garden, off road parking, and a garage. "
" FOUR DOUBLE BEDS * PEACEFUL CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION *  Superior OPEN PLAN kitchen/family/diner and double doors leading to the rear garden, spacious lounge with BAY WINDOW, UTILITY, downstairs W/C, HOME OFFICE, master bedroom with ENSUITE & FITTED WARDROBES. GARAGE and DRIVEWAY ..."
"** Portfolio Sale ** Situated in the extremely sought-after Maldon district lies this excellent investment opportunity, offering a former five bedroom mid terrace Victorian bay fronted house, now divided into five apartments within striking distance of Colchester's historic & exciting city..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this well-presented, four bedroom detached family house, situated offering excellent access to the A12, A120, Colchester Business Park, Colchester General Hospital, the popular Gilber..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000 ** Harris + Wood Chesterwell are delighted to offer for sale, this four/five bedroom, three storey townhouse, situated on the popular and picturesque Forest View development. The location provides excellent access to the A12, Colchester's general ho..."
A six bedroom Grade II listed home with a one bedroom ground floor annexe. Ideal family home or great potential for a HMO.
"***GUIDE PRICE £525,000 - £550,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this executive four bedroom detached family home, situated in the heart of Lexden to the west of Colchester. This ""no-through road"" ..."
"Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, Gallant Richardson are pleased to offer for sale this established, spacious three bedroom detached bungalow. Situated on a corner plot in the extremely sought after area of Lexden. Being within very close proximity to the Colchester Royal Grammar School, Hig..."
"**Guide Price £525,000 - £550,000** A handsome and aesthetically pleasing five bedroom detached family home, which also benefits from a self-contained one bedroom annexe and is situated to the West of Colchester in the popular district of Stanway. This home is within easy access of..."
"This stunning four double-bedroom detached home is situated in a peaceful location, perfect for those seeking a tranquil retreat from the hustle and bustle of everyday life. The property boasts ample living space, with each of the four bedrooms offering plenty of room to relax and unwind. "
"This well presented and spacious detached family home, is to be found in a quiet cul-de-sac, positioned on the popular Lakelands development. This area is desirable for families because of its close proximity to good schooling, an abundance of amenities including Tollgate and Stane retail park..."
A truly iconic home of considerable stature. Improved by the current owners own hands you can only but appreciate the love that has gone in to creating something truly special here. You must see this aspirational yet utilitarian home
"Guide Price £525,000- £550,000 This stunning detached home boasts a prime position on this popular Bellway development on the north side of Colchester, with views to the front of communal green/park, and views to the side of a wooded copse. Offered for sale with no onward c..."
"The Grove at Chesterwell is a highly desirable collection of spacious 2,3 & 4 bedroom homes set in a beautifully landscaped surroundings and designed for countryside living. Please call Amanda to make your appointment to view. "
WEST FACING GARDEN * PEACEFUL CUL-DE-SAC * GARAGE & DRIVEWAY * LARGE OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY AREA * SPACIOUS lounge with BAY WINDOW * FRENCH DOORS to the garden from kitchen * Master bedroom with FITTED WARDROBES and EN SUITE * Family bathroom with separate SHOWE...
4 SUPERB OFFERS AVAILABLE! * EDGE OF DEVELOPMENT LOCATION * GARAGE & DRIVEWAY * LARGE OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING/FAMILY AREA * SPACIOUS lounge with BAY WINDOW * FRENCH DOORS to the garden from kitchen * Master bedroom with FITTED WARDROBES and EN SUIT...
"LARGE PLOT BACKING ONTO FISHING LAKE is this extended detached three double bedroom bungalow being sold with NO ONWARD CHAIN in the village of Rowhedge with views over the river and set down a private road. The property offers character features including fireplaces and sash windows, three double..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £500,000 - £525,000 ***Located on the fringes of a cul-de-sac in Stanway, is this five bedroom link detached family home. The property's position allows for excellent access to a wealth of amenities including walking distance to pre-school, primary and sec..."
"**Guide Price £500,000 to £525,000** - An extended and well presented five bedroom link detached family home situated in this convenient location close to all amenities in Stanway with bus services for the town, good access for the A12 and M25, short distance to rail station to London L..."
"Looking for an investment property? A lovely apartment with a tenant in situ, this home can be bought as a going concern with immediate return"
"This Exceptional *DETACHED HOUSE* is particularly well presented offering *SUBSTANTIAL FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* with viewing highly recommended. Situated in the *SOUGHT-AFTER MYLAND AREA* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"***GUIDE PRICE £500,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this beautiful, four bedroom detached house situated in the sought after, Old Heath area of Colchester providing a range of useful schools, shops and amenitie..."
"Situated in the highly desirable North of Colchester is this impressive five bedroom detached family home. Benefitting from convenient access to Colchester's thriving town centre, Turner Rise Retail Park as well as the A12. Located within walking distance of Colchester's General Hospital with eas..."
"We bring to the market this well-presented and modern bungalow situated on Layer Road. The property benefits from large open plan kitchen/family room with bi-folding doors and glass lantern. There is a separate lounge with bay window, three double bedrooms, en-suite and utility room. Early vie..."
"This spacious five-bedroom family home is located in the popular district of Stanway with excellent access to the A12, popular schools and local shops. The property benefits from a recently fitted Wren kitchen and replacement boiler, ample parking and a garage. This stunning family home ..."
"Situated in the beautiful Lexden Park with stunning views over the lake sits this deceptively spacious and well presented, three/four bedroom terraced town house. Being set over three floors, this would be ideal for anyone looking to move straight in without having to lift a finger. L..."
"**PLOT OF THE WEEK - EXCLUSIVE PRICE OF £499,995** Layer Park, a sophisticated collection of contemporary new homes each crafted to cater to every aspect of 21st century living. Set on the peaceful yet well-connected border of Colchester, where this vibrant, thriving new city meets the s..."
"The Whiteleaf is a gorgeous family home. The kitchen/breakfast/family room enjoys an open aspect through French doors. There is a living room, dining room, cloakroom and utility. Upstairs there are four double bedrooms, with bedroom one benefiting from an en suite, a bathroom and storage cupboards."
"PEACEFUL CUL-DE-SAC * EDGE OF DEVELOPMENT LOCATION * ENERGY EFFICIENT * 5* BUILDER * SPACIOUS lounge. OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining / family area with FRENCH DOORS to the south east facing garden. Two DOUBLE bedrooms, with master EN SUITE and FITTED WARDROBES. Family bathroom w..."
"The Bixley is a SUPERB 4 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME boasting an OPEN PLAN KITCHEN/DINING AREA with a handy UTILITY AREA, a SEPARATE LIVING ROOM, AN IMPRESSIVE MASTER BEDROOM with FITTED WARDROBE and EN SUITE, THREE FURTHER BEDROOMS plus ample parking wi"
"
Final selection of three-bedroom Shared Ownership houses now available in Colchester. 
"
"Established four bedroom detached house located in a popular part of Stanway close to Stanway Green. The house offers good sized accommodation, pleasant gardens, large garage and gas heating."
"Situated to the north of Colchester's City centre is this well presented and spacious four bedroom detached family home. Built by Crest Nicholson in 2016, and conveniently located offering excellent access to the A12, General Hospital and North Station, which offers direct ..."
"Guide Price £475,000 - £500,000 This superbly presented detached family home offers an entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, cloakroom and conservatory. On the first floor there are four bedrooms and a family bathroom. The property benefits from a garage and b..."
"Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this well presented, four bedroom detached family home. Situated in Stanway you are close to Lakelands Primary School and local shops including supermarkets and restaurants. The accommodation is deceptively spacious throughout and would..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £475,000 - £500,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this beautifully presented four bedroom link-detached house, situated in the popular area of Prettygate which benefits from local amenities. There are frequent bus services leading to..."
"Situated to the West of Colchester, this impressive family home is ideally located within easy reach of good schooling, A12 access and Stanefield Retail Park which offers a selection of amenities and a large Sainsburys superstore. As you can see from the photographs, the current owners have taken..."
"
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this very well presented and excellent sized five bedroom link detached property situated in a quiet cul de sac location in the sought after Stanway area to the west of Colchester. This lovely family home offers accommodation spread over three floors includi..."
" ** Guide Price £475,000 £500,000 ** This superbly presented four bedroom detached family home is situated on the popular Highwoods development in the North of Colchester close to all local amenities, offering a good size well presented living space throughout, large garden, garage and..."
"Guide Price of £475,000 - £500,000 A perfectly positioned semi-detached house is situated in the highly sought-after area of Lexden in Colchester and presents an excellent opportunity for those seeking a renovation project. The property is set on a large plot, providing ample outdoor spa..."
"Palmer and Partners are delighted to offer for sale this four bedroom detached bungalow in the sought after Stanway region of Colchester, offering excellent A12 access and just a short distance to Tollgate Shopping centre as well as local shops and amenities and good local schooling. The int..."
"Located within a small cul-de-sac location in Stanway, is this five bedroom link detached family home. The property's position allows for excellent access to a wealth of amenities including walking distance to pre-school, primary and secondary schooling as well as bus routes. Just a short driv..."
"Extended and modernised offering a very contemporary way of living for all the family, is this four bedroom semi detached family residence. Occupying a pleasant position on the ever sought after Layer Road. Within striking distance of Colchester's historic city centre, access to train stations..."
"Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this unique plot which offers four generous bedrooms, off road parking to the front plus a carport situated to the side providing further off road parking. Perfectly situated to the North of Colchester's City Centre you are close to all local ameni..."
"Location is key with this extended four bedroom semi detached family home, ideally located within close proximity of good schooling, local shops and supermarkets, Tollgate retail park, A12/A120, excellent public transport links and easy access to a choice of train stations which offer dir..."
"Having been fully renovated throughout to a high standard, is this two bedroom detached bungalow in Stanway. Location here is ideal for access to local amenities, good schooling, shops, Tollgate and Stane retail parks, hairdressers and access to local public transport links are within easy wal..."
"Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this four bedroom detached family home, situated in the sought after location of Prettygate, with good access to popular local primary and secondary schooling. The city centre itself offers a varied ..."
"This deceptive property offers a wealth of internal space aswell as a generous rear garden. Situated in the popular and sought after Prettygate, this four bedroom property has a big emphasis on social space. Formerly used as a care home, this space could be used as a great business pre..."
"*PERFECT FAMILY HOME* The Silversmith is a 4-bedroom home that features a spacious living room, an open-plan kitchen and family area, a formal dining room and an en suite to bedroom 1. French doors in the family area and a second set of French doors in the living room open on to the garden."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £465,000 - £485,000 *** An impressive three bedroom detached bungalow with driveway and garage located down a quiet cul-de-sac to the West side of Colchester, not only is this property located within walking distance to local shops and amenities, you will find the A1..."
"A superbly presented three bedroom detached bungalow within a highly sought after and convenient location close to Tesco superstore, the General Hospital and A12 offering spacious accommodation on a corner plot with a conservatory and garage with no onward chain."
Who could resist this pretty 3 bed house in lovely location. Close to Chesterwell Plaza and new schools coming shortly. Overlooking open spaces with established woods for you to enjoy. Book your appointment to view and see why you can be part of the Chesterwell Community. 
"Situated to the west of Colchester city centre, offering excellent access to the main A12 trunk road, local shops and facilities, we are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom, two reception room detached bungalow with ensuite, gas central heating (not tested by Elms Price and Co), double..."
"The Goldcrest with OPEN PLAN kitchen/dining area with utility area and French doors leading to the GARDEN. Separate entrance hall with WC. The first floor the master bedroom has a FITTED WARDROBE and an EN-SUITE, two more bedrooms, an airing cupboard and a family bathroom. OPEN WEEKEND "
"A*HIGH-QUALITY DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE* is *EXCEPTIONALLY WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* offering *GENEROUS ACCOMMODATION* with *VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION* convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
"This three bedroom detached chalet bungalow, which is in need of updating throughout is located in the popular and sought after location of Stanway Green. Perfectly placed within walking distance of the green, close to The Stanway School, as well as within close proximity to local shops and re..."
"Elegant, charming & aesthetically pleasing, this handsome three bedroom 'bay-fronted' Victorian terrace property has it all. This exquisite home is positioned in the Maldon Road District of Lexden, Colchester and within minutes of some of the countries finest private & comprehensive sc..."
"Enjoying a generous plot size of approaching 0.25 acres (STS), this family home offers three double bedrooms, two reception rooms, large conservatory, and en-suite shower room to the main bedroom. EPC D."
"***GUIDE PRICE £450,000-£475,000***
Located to the North side of Colchester within close proximity to the general hospital and North station we are delighted to offer this Four bedroom family home which is well presented throughout and benefits from a driveway leading to a carport and g..."
"Stunning family home located to the North of Colchester City Centre, offering generous accommodation and in immaculate condition. This property is not one to be missed"
"Positioned on a large plot to the south of Colchester, is this three bedroom detached bungalow. This location is popular for local schooling, access to the City Centre, Tollgate retail park, public transport links and Mersea Island is also located only a short drive away, offering an array of ..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well-presented three bedroom detached bungalow, occupying an impressive position to the south-east of Colchester, enjoying undisturbed field views. The bungalow is within easy reach of Colchester's city centre, local co-operative s..."
"Occupying a mature plot approaching 0.25 of an acre, a deceptively spacious detached bungalow offering a tastefully presented interior and benefitting from a delightful rear garden, carport, garage and off road parking."
Situated in the ever popular St. Johns area is this fully renovated four bedroom detached chalet bungalow.
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this spacious semi-detached family house, situated in the popular Lexden district of Colchester within close proximity to the popular schools of Phillip Morant, St Benedict's, Stanway Secondary and Home Farm primary. Shopping facilities a..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this two double bedroom, semi-detached house, situated within a short distance to Colchester's North Station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street, the General Hospital, Turner..."
**DETACHED HOUSE**FOUR BEDROOMS**GARAGE AND CARPORT**CLOSE TO SHOPS**NO ONWARD CHAIN** Purplebricks are delighted to offer this spacious four bedroom detached house which is situated on the popular St. Johns development in Colchester. The house has great sized accommodation which comprises: ent...
We have pleasure in offering for sale this extended detached character cottage dating back to 1838 with a wealth of features throughout and incorporates a recently constructed studio/games room measuring approximately 5m x 4m.
"Four Bedroom House located on the ever popular new Braiswick Park development, being within easy walking distance of Colchester North Station with its direct links to London Liverpool Street inapprox 45mins. Colchester City centre is also in easy access with its multiple shopping facilities. The ..."
"**Guide Price £450,000 - £475,000** A versatile example of an excellent four/five bedroom town house, occupying a favourable position within the favourable 'Kingswood Heath' development in a prime North-Colchester position and a home that is simply that not to be missed. Presented ..."
"The Charnwood Corner features a stunning open-plan kitchen/diner and an impressive living room with French doors opening into the garden. A utility room, WC and storage cupboards make it practical as well as stylish. Upstairs are three bedrooms - one is en suite - a family bathroom and more storage."
"Jackson and Co are extremely pleased to bring to the market this immaculate, four double bedroom, executive family home. Having been renovated by the current vendors the property boasts a stylish kitchen, two reception rooms, office , off road parking for three vehicles as well as a garage. Th..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000** We are delighted to offer this four bedroom detached family home, situated towards the end of a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular Highwoods area. Falling within catchment area of the sought after Gilberd School and offering great links to t..."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE* provides *GENEROUS ACCOMMODATION* and *WELL-PRESENTED THROUGHOUT*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC OFF EASTWOOD DRIVE* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"Situated in the beautiful Lexden Park with stunning views over the lake sits this deceptively spacious, three/four bedroom end of terraced town house. Being set over three floors, this would be an ideal purchase for a family looking to create a house into their forever home. Lexden Pa..."
Temme English are delighted to present this IMMACULATE three bedroom detached home spread over three floors positioned on the ever popular Kingswood Heath development situated close to an array of local amenities and popular schooling
"We are delighted to offer for sale this extremely well-presented three bedroom detached bungalow in the highly sought after area of Prettygate. The property benefits from NO CHAIN, three double bedrooms, large kitchen/diner, separate lounge, ample off road parking to the front and side.
"
"Stunning five bedroom family home, laid out over three floors in a Town House style, with a family bathroom and an en-suite shower room, high quality fitted kitchen/diner and a generous rear garden. This is a must view!!"
"Occupying a non estate position, this spacious detached house offers a tastefully presented interior, attractive garden, parking for numerous vehicles and a detached double garage."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this spacious bay fronted semi detached house which is situated in popular location of Lexden. The property has been extended over the years and provides great accommodation and also has a large rear garden with sheds and car port to the rear. The accommodat...
"Located in a delightful position on the highly sought-after Highwoods Country Park, this property boasts spectacular views overlooking the tranquil woodlands, an idyllic retreat for those seeking a peaceful lifestyle – while still being conveniently located to a wide range of amenities including ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £450,000 - £475,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well-presented four bedroom semi-detached house, situated just off Maldon Road, close to Colchester city centre and within Hamilton Primary School catchment. The city centre is..."
"An outstanding three bedroom detached bungalow situated in the highly desirable area of Prettygate. The bungalow is within close proximity to local shopping facilities, is being offered to a high standard internally, and with no onward chain. "
"Connells are pleased to bring to the market a spacious and well presented, four bedroom detached family home offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN. Positioned in a quiet road yet close to all local amenities and only a short drive away from Colchester's bustling City Centre"
Offers in excess of 450000 Key features Four/five bedroom semi detached house Own driveway for 3-4 cars to be parked Large kitchen/diner Sought-after Pretty-gate location No onward chain Plans approved for further rear and side-ways single storey extension. Very near to UK's best gr...
"This is a popular three-bedroom home. The Sherwood has an open-plan kitchen/dining room and a bright front-aspect living room. A utility room, storage cupboard and downstairs cloakroom complete the ground floor. Upstairs, bedroom one is en suite and there’s a family bathroom and further storage."
"The Clayton features a stunning open plan kitchen diner and an equally impressive living room. A utility room, WC and storage cupboard ensure it is practical as well as stylish. Upstairs you will find three bedrooms, a large bedroom one with an en suite, bathroom and a handy storage cupboard."
"
A brand new collection of 3-bedroom Shared Ownership houses now available in Colchester.
"
*NO ONWARD CHAIN* Situated to the south of Colchester this spacious bungalow offers versatility and great location.
"Commanding an excellent position within the ever popular 'Kingswood Heath' development, in a prime North-Colchester position, sits this incredibly spacious four bedroom end of terrace town house. Soon to be within striking distance of Colchester's eagerly anticipated Northern Gateway, this hom..."
"A well appointed four bedroom detached family home, situated on a good size plot in Highwoods, providing excellent access to the Gilberd School and other local amenities, the A12, General Hospital and North Station with links to London and beyond. Internally the accommodation comprises..."
"**Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000** Situated off of the ever popular Maldon Road and commanding a favourable position in Colchester's historic and vibrant city centre, this imposing three bedroom double bay fronted semi-detached home offers a wealth of both reception and bedroom sp..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £425,000 TO £450,000 ***This four bedroom detached family home, is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN, finished to an exceptional standard and is fortunately positioned on a popular family orientated development to the south of Colchester.Internally this ..."
"An exceptional three bedroom detached residence occupying a pleasant elevated position on the ever sought after Maldon Road, within striking distance of the Town, Station and excellent local schools. The property has been extended and heavily improved by the current owners to a fabulous standard,..."
"Within walking distance of North Station with links to London and beyond, sits this extended and very well presented three bedroom detached family home. Braiswick is also conveniently located for excellent access to the A12 and Colchester General Hospital, with the City centre also being within ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000 ** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Situated in the heart of Colchester sits this three bedroom, semi detached family home. This would be a great opportunity for a family looking to create a house into their forever home, being set in a popular location, you ar..."
"The Eaton offers a spacious living room with DOUBLE DOORS leading into the OPEN PLAN kitchen/diner. FRENCH DOORS go out to the garden. The first floor presents 2 good sized bedrooms with an EN SUITE to bedroom 2. The second floor holds the master which also contains an EN SUITE. GARAGE and PARKING,,"
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 to £450,000
We have pleasure in offering for sale this extended detached family house featuring four bedrooms with en suite to master, lounge with multi fuel burning stove, large kitchen breakfast room, dining room and study.  The pro..."
"*** DISCREET MARKETING ***
** FOUR BEDROOM PROPERTY **
* GOOD CONDITION, GARAGE AND DRIVEWAY * Idyllically located towards the North of Colchester in the popular Myland area and within easy access to the A12, the Gilberd School and Highwoods Country Park is this immaculate and well proportioned ..."
"VIEWING REFERENCE: MC0527 - We are delighted to bring to market this beautifully presented four bedroom detached home located in the sought after area of St Johns, Colchester
"
Situated to the south of Colchester and within walkable distance to local amenities sits this substantial four bedroom link-detached family home. REF(COS230115) 
"Yopa is pleased to offer this Five Double Bedroom Townhouse in the sought-after location of CO4. The property is stretched over 3 floors and is immaculate throughout. Garage, carport, and a good size rear garden with rear gated access."
"We are delighted to offer this WELL-PRESENTED three bedroom detached house situated in the sought after area of BRAISWICK. The property is within easy reach of Colchester´s mainline railway station (London Liverpool Street approximately one hour), shops and facilities. "
"NO ONWARD CHAIN, southside of Colchester, verstaile DETACHED BUNGALOW, three bedrooms, bathroom, kitchen lounge and conservatory, SOUTH WEST FACING GARDEN measures 59ft x40ft approx gargae and DRIVEWWAY FOR MULTIPLE CARS, potential to extend and improve subject to planning. "
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this substantial four/bedroom town house, situated providing excellent access to the A12, General Hospital, local schools including The Gilberd secondary school, shops and North station with mainline links to London Liverpool street. "
"
A brand new collection of three-bedroom Shared Ownership houses now available in Colchester.
"
"
A brand new collection of three-bedroom Shared Ownership houses now available in Colchester. 
"
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000. We are delighted to market this modern and immaculately presented three bedroom detached property in the desirable position of Millers Lane. The property benefits from open plan living space, external office with power and light, raised decking and a..."
"Guide Price £425,000-£450,000. We are delighted to present this three bedroom DETACHED bungalow situated to the West side of Colchester on the popular 'Westlands'"
"**Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000** An imposing three bedroom semi-detached family home, offered to the market with the added benefit of no onward chain and boasting a mature front and rear garden. Favourably positioned along a peaceful residential road in the heart of Colchester's..."
"This stunning 1930s built box bay window semi detached house is situated in a popular position offering good access to Colchester's city centre. The property benefits from two reception rooms, three good size bedrooms, off road parking and generous garden."
A beautiful ground floor later living apartment on the outskirts of the town centre with local amenities and a real sense of community. We would say this is more of a luxury hotel then an apartment building and the communal facilities as well as the main accommodation are just sublime
"GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000. NO ONWARD CHAIN...we are delighted to offer for sale this extended three bedroom semi-detached bungalow which is presented to the market in a high standard throughout. The property is in the sought after residential area of Prettygate and offers conveni..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this substantial five bedroom semi-detached house, situated on the popular St Johns development to the north of Colchester, being close to popular primary schooling, shopping facilities and good access to the A12 and station with mainline..."
"** Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 ** Situated in this sought after location is this renovated and extended three bedroom semi-detached bungalow offered to modern contemporary living standards and open-plan living with stylish kitchen and bathroom, re laid patio, turf and no onward chain. "
"Offered with no onward chain is this spacious modern three bedroom detached bungalow just to the south of the town centre benefitting from an ensuite to master, conservatory, ample parking with in and out driveway and double garage."
"Situated in the sought-after area of Prettygate is this stunning three bedroom semi-detached bungalow. To the West of Colchester, the property is located in close reach of various local amenities including shops, schooling and with convenient access to Colchester's town centre. With easy bus rout..."
"Currently let to five tenants for £2,500 per calendar month until August 2024, is this 4/5 bed home. Located within minutes of Essex University and Colchester Hythe Train Station. Offering either four generous bedrooms and a reception room or five bedrooms, this spacious home is ideal fo..."
"£425,000-£450,000 Guide Price. A fantastic *EXTENDED DETACHED HOUSE* is *WELL-PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* providing *SUBSTANTIAL FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* viewing highly recommended. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHNS ESTATE* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
"Situated in the Blackheath district of Colchester's vibrant and exciting city centre, this extended and improved four bedroom semi-detached family home commands a favourable position within this cul-de-sac. Offering versatile living for the expanding family, a wealth of reception and bedroom s..."
"Delighted with the opportunity to offer this luxury Penthouse Apartment, boasting over 2,000 square ft of accommodation and having been designed and finished to an exceptionally high standard only the current owner has since upgraded and redesigned many features to make the property even ..."
"Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 Situated on a quiet cul-de-sac in Lexden is this beautifully presented, extended three-bedroom semi-detached family home. The property benefits from an abundance of local amenities within a short distance of Stanway’s ever-developing retail parks..."
Located in a highly desirable location is this exceptionally well presented four bedroom town house. 
"**GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Positioned in the highly popular Prettygate area, within walking distance to local shops, amenities and local bus routes is this immaculately presented, three bedroom semi detached bungalow. The current owners have fully renova..."
NO CHAIN! This attractive four bedroom detached family home is situated to the West side of Colchester with fantastic local schooling and access to the A12
"This exceptional *DETACHED HOUSE* provides *GENEROUS FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* and is *WELL-PRESENTED THROUGHOUT*. Nestled in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various amenities, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120. An early internal inspection is highly recommended."
"***GUIDE PRICE £425,000 - £450,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this beautifully presented, three bedroom, semi-detached bungalow, situated in a highly popular position in the Prettygate area, within walkin..."
"A well presented and extended four bedroom semi-detached family home, located to the south of Colchester. with additional detached annexe accommodation to the side. Internally the ground floor accommodation comprises of an entrance hall, spacious living room, conservatory, study/fourth..."
"Chesterwell Grove, the new phase at Chesterwell, this delightful development is maturing into a tranquil oasis and fast becoming a 'community'. Call Angela or Amanda and book an appointment, new releases all the time. Appointments only. "
"The Whinfell is a semi-detached, four-bedroom home boasting a kitchen/dining room and bright living room with French doors leading into the garden. Bedroom one has an en suite, there’s a family bathroom and a downstairs WC. Along with five storage cupboards this home is practical as well as stylish."
"CHAIN FREE-A two-bedroom ground-floor apartment with a private, undercover terrace area. Gilberd House is situated in the desirable location of Lexden Park benefiting from views of a large wildlife pond and onwards into the Park itself which is ideal for walkers and nature lovers. The apartment i..."
"An appealing three bedroom link detached house offering a smartly presented interior with the benefit of gas fired central heating, an impressive 20' 3"" kitchen/breakfast room, en-suite shower room and garage."
" Purplebricks are delighted to offer this good size, four bedroom link detached family home, situated on this highly sought after modern development within a short distance to Colchester's North Station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street, The General Hospital and Colchester's histori..."
"Plot 22 has flooring included. A three-bedroom home, the Chester link has everything you need for modern living. Downstairs is a kitchen/dining room, spacious living room, storage cupboard and a WC. The first floor has a generous bedroom one and en suite plus three more bedrooms."
"Chesterwell, the number one destination in north Colchester, ideal for commuting or just enjoying your environment with plenty of green open spaces to explore at your leisure. Call now and make an appointment with Angela or Amanda. "
"A good size four bedroom semi-detached family home situated within a walking distance of Colchester North Station and the Oaks Hospital offered in good decorative order with ground floor cloakroom, kitchen/diner, modern shower room and garden with summer house."
"***GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this four bedroom semi-detached family home, situated just a short distance to Colchester's city centre with good access to popular local primary and secondary schooling, shops and am..."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this delightful *LINK-DETACHED BUNGALOW* is well-presented throughout and set in a *CHARMING CUL-DE-SAC* within the *SOUGHT-AFTER MAGDALEN WOOD* on the *POPULAR ST JOHNS ESTATE*. The property is ideal for *VARIOUS LOCAL SHOPS*, schools, bus routes and the A12/A120."
"This exceptionally well presented link detached home occupies a good size plot and is located on the popular Chesterwell development to the north of the City, conveniently placed for local amenities. The accommodation comprises an entrance hallway, ground floor cloakroom, kitchen/break..."
"NO CHAIN! We are DELIGHTED to present this well appreciated, IMPRESSIVE, detached property which enjoys an elevated position overlooking The Nation Trust Bourne Mill & Bourne Valley Wildlife sites"
"Guide Price £400,00 - £425,000 This modern 3-bedroom townhouse is situated in the desirable Stanway area of Colchester, offering a convenient and comfortable lifestyle. The property boasts a stylish and contemporary design, with ample living space spread across three floors. On ..."
"**Portfolio** **Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000** Perfect for Investors, this portfolio comprises of two one bedroom flats and a single two bedroom flat, all located in the same detached and previously converted block. Currently achieving a NET yield o..."
"**Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000** We are delighted to offer this outstanding portfolio opportunity, comprising of three separate maisonettes in one detached block of a converted building and ownership of the freehold. All three are presently let with long term tenants in ..."
"Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000 Situated in the highly sought-after Stanway area, is this beautifully presented and well-proportioned four-bedroom detached property. Offering an abundance of local amenities close by including doctors and dentist surgeries. With retail and entertainment options, b..."
"This semi detached family home is situated on the popular west side of Colchester. The property benefits from two reception rooms, three bedrooms, front & rear gardens, off road parking and garage."
"Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000. This charming two-bedroom renovated detached bungalow offers a perfect blend of modern upgrades and classic features. Situated in a tranquil and sought-after neighbourhood, this property is designed to offer the ultimate in comfort and style. You..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 ** Set in a popular location close to all local amenities sits this four bedroom detached family home. The accommodation is deceptively spacious throughout and would be ideal for a family looking to nestle down. The dining room to the rear of the pro..."
"** Guide Price £400,000-£425,000 ** An extended four bedroom detached family house in this sought after location with three reception rooms, three bathrooms, large garage / workshop, good size gardens and ample parking with car port. "
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this spacious and extended detached bungalow which is situated close to the popular St.Johns area to the north of Colchester. The property is offered in immaculate condition and has been completely transformed by the current owners with a new kitchen and showe...
"*NO ONWARD CHAIN* Guide Price: £400,000 - £425,000 This exceptional family home is presented in excellent condition throughout. "
"Guide Price of £400,000 - £425,000. Situated at the end of a cul-de-sac in the highly popular location of Stanway, is this well-presented three bedroom detached bungalow. With easy access to the A12/A120 for major city links, as well as an abundance of local amenities, restaurants, and e..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 ** Situated in the sought-after location of Stanway presents this substantial four-bedroom home offering brilliant kerb appeal and a wealth of space throughout. Through the front door you are met by a porch and entrance hallway leading to ..."
"Within striking distance of Holmwood House Co-Educational School and favourably positioned along Chitts Hill in Lexden, this imposing circa 1950s property would make without question an excellent family home. Spacious and well-presented throughout, it offers generous living and bedroom accommo..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £400,000 - £425,000 ** We are delighted to offer this three bedroom detached family home benefiting from garage and driveway, conservatory, three good size bedrooms with an En-suite to the master. The rear garden is a generous size being South West facing."
**CLOSE TO NORTH STATION**MODERN DETACHED HOUSE**GARAGE AND PARKING**VIEWING ESSENTIAL** Purplebricks are delighted to offer this immaculately presented modern three bedroom detached house which is situated in North Colchester/Braiswick boarder with excellent primary schools close by and the ab...
Move straight in to this stunning three bedroom town house located on the Highwoods development on the north side of Colchester
"Guide Price £400,000-£425,000. Occupying a *GENEROUS PLOT* this fantastic *DETACHED CHALET STYLE BUNGALOW* with *SUBSTANTIAL ACCOMMODATION* with the potential to make the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *POPULAR LOCATION* convenient for *VARIOUS SHOPS*, local schools, and the A12/A120."
Temme English are delighted to present this substantial FIVE BEDROOM semi-detached home situated in this increasingly popular Shrub End location
"Guide Price £400,000 to £425,000. Backing on the Gilberd School playing fields. This three to four Bedroom town house, offers Entrance Hall ground floor cloakroom, useful bedroom four / study, well-appointed Kitchen Breakfast room, First Floor lounge, bathroom and Bedroom T..."
"Guide Price £400,000 - £425,000 A beautifully presented three/four bedroom semi-detached townhouse is finished to an extremely high standard throughout and is positioned on a popular family-orientated development in Highwoods. Internally this home has been recently refurbished throughout..."
"Situated in the sought after St Johns district of Colchester is this established two bedroom detached bungalow with good size gardens and off-road parking, a short distance to St Johns shopping parade and on the bus route for the city centre. "
"PRICE GUIDE £400,000---£425,000 This spacious freehold house is located in a desirable area close to the heart of Colchester's busy city center. It has been lovingly converted into three self-contained flats, perfect for buyers looking to invest or live in one apartment while renting out the oth..."
"We are pleased to offer this generously sized and versatile three / four bedroom family home in the highly sought after Gilberd School catchment area. Offering a high specification and modern kitchen / diner, a living room with a view, a multi-purpose ground floor room as well as a garage, alloca..."
"Town and Country are pleased to present this beautifully presented, three bedroom detached bungalow situated in the popular area of St Johns. St johns offers a list of outstanding primary schools and also easy access to the A12 alongside a short walking to Highwoods Country Park. This property is..."
"Situated within a sought after area, within easy access to the A12 and walking distance to local shops and amenities, is this three bedroom detached bungalow. Upon entering the home, via the enclosed porch, you are greeted with a welcoming hallway which provides access to all of the accommodat..."
"*Rated a 5 star HBF builder!* This brand new home really does have it all, complete with a modern interior throughout including bay window to the living room, INTEGRATED KITCHEN APPLIANCES, downstairs cloakroom and an en suite to bedroom 1. *SOUTH FACING GARDEN & DRIVEWAY PARKING WITH GARAGE*"
"Secure this brand new DOUBLE FRONTED HOME today, complete with driveway parking, a WEST FACING GARDEN, a dual aspect living room with French doors to the garden, integrated kitchen appliances, UTILITY ROOM and an en suite to bedroom 1. This home also comes with a 10-year NHBC Buildmark policy."
Situated in the sought after Abbey Fields area of South Colchester is this stunning three bedroom converted military building which is full of character and exclusivity
"This three bedroom modern town house is located within walking distance to Colchester city centre and train station. On entering the property, there is an entrance hallway with doors through to the kitchen, lounge/diner and downstairs WC and a staircase to the first floor. The kitchen..."
"*Guide Price £390,000 - £410,000* *Offered tenants in situ or no chain* Positioned in Northern Colchester this property would make a fantastic investment or a brilliant family home. Currently used as an HMO bringing in £2600pcm this property provides ample ..."
"A three bedroom semi-detached moderm family home with garage and a large rear garden. The property offers an entrance hallway, cloakroom, kitchen and lounge/diner to the ground floor. There are two double bedrooms, an en-suite shower room and family shower room to the first floor, and ..."
"This brand new home is chain free and comes complete with a spacious living room with bay window, OPEN PLAN KITCHEN & DINING ROOM with integrated kitchen appliances, plus an en suite to bedroom 1. Outside boasts a PRIVATE GARDEN and driveway parking. ***Rated a 5 star HBF builder 2023!*** "
"We are delighted to offer chain free, this extended three bedroom detached home on a corner plot in the popular St Johns area. Offering a South facing rear garden, good room sizes throughout, an integral garage and driveway. It would benefit from updating the décor. Located within a short ..."
"* NO ONWARD CHAIN * An attractive double bayed Victorian semi-detached family home with loft conversion, situated in this highly sought after location and offering many period features being close to Hamilton Rd Primary School and the City centre."
"This *DETACHED HOUSE* is well presented with *SUBSTANTIAL ACCOMMODATION* making the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME* viewing recommended. The property is situated in a *SOUGHT AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"**INTERNAL PHOTOGRAPHS TO FOLLOW**Located within walking distance of North Station, ideal for the commuter with links in to London Liverpool street and beyond, sits this very well presented three bedroom detached family home. Braiswick is also conveniently located for excellent access t..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £385,000 - £400,000 *** Jackson and Co are delighted to present this attractive two bedroom detached bungalow in the sought after location of Stanway, to the West of Colchester. The property is set within an excellent distance to the A12 and Tollgate retail park, in..."
"LOCATION LOCATION! PRETTYGATE - Perfectly positioned in a cul de sac, within the very popular area of Prettygate, is this extended three bedroom bay fronted semi detached home perfect for family living - Good sized accommodation includes large lounge, separate dining room (which can easily be op..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £380,000-£400,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom town house, situated within walking distance of Colchester's historic city centre and provideing excellent access to the town train station with mainline links to..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this bay-fronted semi-detached house situated just off Layer Road. The property is in excellent condition throughout and viewing is recommended; benefits include driveway and garage, shower room with separate WC, Hamilton Primary School catchment. "
"Martin & Co are pleased to present this RECENTLY BUILT, modern, three double bedroom, semi detached house with a large private rear garden, an attached single garage and covered driveway that can accommodate multiple cars. *VIEWINGS BY APPOINTMENT ONLY*"
"**LAST THREE REMAINING - EXCLSUIVE OFFER AVAILABLE** (Apartment 53/Plot 49) McCarthy & Stone offers retirement living to the highest of standards. Raising the benchmark and exceeding all expectations, Lancer House is positioned in the heart of Colchester's City Centre and offers tranquil, ..."
"This exceptional *DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED* providing *GENEROUS ACCOMMODATION* making the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* in the *ROACH VALE AREA* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops and the A12/A120. Viewing is highly recommended."
"This two bedroom detached bungalow is situated on the west side of Colchester offering excellent access to great transport links. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, off road parking for several cars, integral garage and enclosed rear garden."
"Beautifully presented and offered to market in excellent order, this three bedroom semi-detached family home is positioned in Prettygate, a favourable district of Colchester's vibrant city centre and home to some of the city's most favourable comprehensive education, as well as being within st..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 ** Situated in the popular Longridge Park to the North of Colchester with excellent access to local schools, shops and amenities sits this deceptively spacious, four bedroom detached family home. The accommodation has been well maintained..."
"Situated in the highly popular Stanway area, sits this well-presented three bedroom end of terrace house. Boasting an abundance of local amenities, including Tollgate Retail Park, the developing Stane Park with a wide variety of food options, doctors, and dentist surgery. Providing easy access to..."
"Early viewing is advised of this spacious town house situated within close proximity of the city centre with its range of shops, restaurants, bars and amenities. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three/four bedrooms, en suite to master, enclosed garden and garage."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £375,000 - £400,000 ***This stunning example of a three bedroom home is located on a highly desirable and family orientated development in Stanway, to the west of Colchester. Offering excellent access to local shopping facilities, restaurants and popular s..."
"Situated in the sought-after modern development is this stylish three double bedroom semi-detached home a short distance from Tollgate shopping district, A12 and popular primary and secondary schooling. "
"**GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000** ***OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN*** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this well presented, five bedroom semi detached house. The spacious accommodation is set over three floors and would be ideal for a growing family looking to nestle ..."
"Situated on an impressive plot, this four bedroom detached home commands a fantastic position in the ever popular 'Longridge' district of Colchester city. Presenting itself as the ideal family home, this property boasts a wealth of reception and bedroom space throughout, as well being spoilt w..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this well-presented three bedroom detached house, situated in the ever popular district of Stanway, to the west of Colchester's city centre, known for highly regarded schooling and ..."
"This three-bedroom property is located in the popular and sought-after area of Lexden, just a short distance to the West of the city centre. It is in the catchment area for Hamilton Primary School, making it a great choice for young families. "
"*Guide price £375,000 - £390,000 * An exceptional extended three bedroom semi-detached family home situated on this desirable location of St Johns close to popular primary schooling and shopping facilities being offered in superb decorative order throughout. "
INVESTORS ONLY - A good size three/four bedroom town house situated within walking distance of Colchester town centre and Abbey Fields. Offered for sale with no onward chain. 
"Situated in the sought-after Shrub End area of Colchester is this spacious well presented three bedroom family home occupying a generous plot with good size garden and ample off road parking, being a short distance to the city centre and popular schooling."
"**GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this five double bedroom detached house, situated to the east of Colchester providing excellent access to nearby schools, shops, amenities, Hy..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom semi-detached house, situated to within walking distance of the highly regarded Hamilton primary school, as well as local shops and amenities. The property is loc..."
An extremely stylish town house located a short distance to the city centre and railway stations offering superb accommodation over three floors and presented to the highest of standards. 
"**Guide Price £375,000 - £400,000** Residing in the ever popular Longridge Park Development, this impressive four bedroom detached family home is ideal for the modern day expanding family and is within easy access to an excellent choice of primary and secondary schools, as well as ..."
"A simply stunning link-detached family home, perfectly positioned in North Colchester for North Station, Superstores, A12/A120/ A133 access and the town centre is close-by also. With a garden room extension and a picture perfect finish, this is too good to miss"
"***GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this three bedroom semi-detached house, situated within walking distance of excellent local schools and Colchester's city centre with a variet..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £375,000 - £400,000 ** Situated in the highly desirable development in Stanway close to local amenities including restaurants, supermarkets and shops plus the A12 with links to Chelmsford and beyond sits this well presented, three bedroom detached family home. "
"* Guide Price £375,000 to £400,000 * The perfect combination of period charm and contemporary finish are featured throughout this exceptional Victorian three bedroom, semi-detached bay fronted residence. Positioned in one of the most sought after roads, in the Lexden district and i..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £375,000-£400,000***
Located in the 'Hamilton Road school catchment area' we are delighted to offer this well presented three bedroom semi-detached Victorian house which benefits from off road parking, original features throughout, established rear garden with detached st..."
"£375,000-£400,000 Guide Price.This fantastic *EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED* offering *AMPLE FAMILY ACCOMMODATION* with *EARLY VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION* convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"GUIDE PRICE £375,000 to £395,000
As the sellers sole agents, we have pleasure in offering for sale this detached family home on the ever popular highwoods development conveneniently situated to the Gilberd School, Colchester North Station and A12 links.  ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 ** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market with no onward chain this deceptively spacious, three bedroom semi detached family home. The downstairs accommodation comprises an entrance hallway with doors leadi..."
Offering versatile spacious well presented accommodation is this four/five bedroom period property a short distance from mainline railway stations and city centre with off road parking and a good sized rear garden.
"Residing on the popular 'Solus Development' and within striking distance of an array of useful amenities, shops, choice of schooling and served by an excellent bus network to Colchester's City Centre, lies this exceptionally presented three bedroom detached family home. Accommodation commences..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £375,000 -£400,000*** ***INVESTMENT ONLY ~ SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this six bedroom terraced house, situated in the sought after area of Prettygate within easy access to local shops, amenities and..."
Temme English are delighted to present this four/five bedroom family home set over three floors situated to the South side of Colchester close to local schooling and amenities
"
Two-bedroom Shared Ownership house available now in Colchester
"
"**LAST THREE REMAINING - EXCLUSIVE OFFER AVAILABLE** (Apartment 36/Plot 33) McCarthy & Stone offers retirement living to the highest of standards. Raising the benchmark and exceeding all expectations, Lancer House is positioned in the heart of Colchester's City Centre and offers tranquil, ..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN* Martin & Co are pleased to present this modern, STUNNING, three double bedroom, mid terrace house with single garage and large private enclosed rear garden just South of Colchester town. AVAILABLE FOR VIEWINGS BY APPOINTMENT ONLY!"
Three-bedroom detached family house located on the popular Poets Corner development in Lexden. The house does require some updating but has gas heating and double glazing.
SOUTH FACING GARDEN * MASTER WITH EN SUITE * OPEN PLAN kitchen dining area with FRENCH DOORS * UTILITY area & CLOAKROOM * Family bathroom with separate BATH and SHOWER.
Temme English are delighted to present this three-bedroom detached home occupying a corner plot to the West of Colchester in the highly desirable Lexden area
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £360,000 - £380,000 *** Located to the West side of Colchester we are delighted to offer this Four bedroom family home benefiting from a 70ft rear garden, Conservatory and with the main house having undergone much improvement by the current owners over recent years...."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to present this three-bedroom detached home occupying a corner plot to the West of Colchester in the highly desirable Lexden area. This family home offers ample potential with accommodation including ground floor cloakroom, large lounge/diner, kitchen leading t..."
A stunning two double bedroom penthouse apartment occupying a wonderful position with views over Colchester's historic castle.
"Located in the sought after Westlands Estate close to local amenities sits this deceptively spacious, three bedroom semi detached house. The accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner, bathroom plus three good size bedrooms. Externally, there is a garage and d..."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market with no onward chain this spacious, three bedroom terraced town house. Colchester's City Centre is only a short drive away offering an array of amenities to enjoy plus the mainline train station with links to London Liverpool ..."
"Prettygate bungalo*** Guide Price-£375,000*** A rare opportunity to purchase an established detached bungalow in the ever popular Prettygate area of Colchester"
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom detached house, situated in the highly sought after area of Lexden, conveniently close to a range of local schools, shops and amenities including Tollgate's Stane Retail Park, as well as easy access to the A12. "
"VIEWINGS 8TH APRIL FROM 1PM. CALL TO ATTEND PLEASE. North Colchester bungalow, three impressive double bedrooms, recently upgraded bath/shower room, 22' lounge plus the kitchen and connecting breakfast room, garage to the rear and no chain !!"
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 ** Set in a popular location close to local amenities and the train station sits this well presented, three bedroom detached family home. The deceptively spacious accommodation comprises an entrance hallway with doors leading off to the ba..."
"This bungalow should not be missed out on, being offered for sale with NO onward chain and the size of accommodation really needs to be viewed internally to be fully appreciated"
"A three-bedroom link-detached property in the sought-after area of Highwoods, to the North of Colchester town centre, benefitting from off-road parking, garage, open-plan living, and an en-suite to the principal bedroom."
Semi-Detached Home - Good Sized Living Room - Modern Kitchen - Downstairs WC - Master Bedroom With En Suite - Additional Bedroom - Family Bathroom - Garden With Outbuilding - Two Allocated Parking Spaces - Excellent Transport Links
"Guide Price of £350,000 to £375,000. Situated on the Procedo development to the South of Colchester, this generously sized family home is located along a quiet walk and offers over 1100 square feet of accommodation. Location here is key with a selection of nearby amenities, popular schoo..."
"A fabulous three bedroom extended semi detached house offered to a very high standard throughout just to the south of the town centre with a stylish kitchen/utility room, external office, off road parking and good living space throughout."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *TERRACE HOUSED* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* making the *IDEAL HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS*. Situated in the *SOUGHT-AFTER MYLAND AREA* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this *CHARMING DETACHED BUNGALOW* offers *AMPLE ACCOMMODATION* with the *POTENTIAL TO MAKE THE IDEAL HOME*. Situated in a *POPULAR LOCATION* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SHOPS*, schools, bus routes and the A12/A120. An early viewing is highly recommended."
*** INVESTMENT OPPITUNITY *** Established HMO which is very well situated for Colchester North mainline railway train station and Colchester General Hospital
Temme English are delighted to present this deceptively spacious three bedroom semi-detached home positioned in a NON ESTATE location to the west side of Colchester. 
"Stunning two bedroom semi-detached home on the new Castellum Grange development, a short distance from the City Centre along with a multitude of local attractions, transport links and amenities. Massively upgraded by the current owners"
"Guide Price of £350,000 - £375,000 This 3-bedroom semi-detached property situated over 3 floors is located at the end of a cul-de-sac, in the highly sought-after area of Stanway, Colchester. As you enter the property, you are greeted by a spacious hallway with plenty of natural..."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this *EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW* offers *SUBSTANTIAL ACCOMMODATION* with potential to make the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *POPULAR LOCATION* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SHOPS*, schools, bus routes and the A12/A120. Viewing is highly recommended."
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £365,000 ** Situated to the South of Colchester, located in the very popular Solace development close to local amenities sits this well presented, four bedroom, terraced family home. The accommodation is spacious throughout and is set over three f..."
"We are delighted to offer this completely unique Duplex First Floor Maisonette in the sought after and historic Dutch Quarter in Colchester City centre. Offering lots of character, large room sizes, high ceilings and original features mixed with modern contemporary kitchen and bathroom, this home..."
"***INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ONLY*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this five bedroom HMO investment opportunity, situated within close proximity of Essex University, the Hythe Mainline Station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street, along with local shopping f..."
* DETACHED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME * EN-SUITE TO MASTER * HOME OFFICE/GYMNASIUM * NO ONWARD CHAIN * KITCHEN/DINER * GARDEN ROOM * LANDSCAPED REAR GARDEN * PARKING FOR TWO CARS * VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMENDED
"Beresfords are delighted to bring to market this three-bedroom, semi0detached home close to Colchester’s historic city centre. Having undergone some refurbishment in the last few years the home has a large modern fitted kitchen, presented in excellent condition."
"Temme English are delighted to present this STUNNING three bedroom, semi-detached, bay fronted home situated in this ever popular Old Heath location"
"A detached two bedroom period property with a wealth of attractive features, with a separate Garden Room and separate Garden Studio / Office. Off Road Parking | Gas Central Heating | EPC D"
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £350,000 - £375,000 *** This beautifully presented three bedroom semi detached family home is located in the popular Stanway area to the west of Colchester. Built on 2020 by Taylor Wimpey Homes the property comprise of a entrance hall, spacious living room, high spe..."
Three bedroom semi-detached bay window Victorian house in sought after Lexden. Close to Town. Parking & garden.
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 ** Located to the north/east of Colchester in a popular location, close to schools and a wealth of amenities, is this beautifully presented detached family home. Internally the property benefits from a entrance area with coat storage, ground floor cl..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000** This three bedroom semi-detached family home can be found off Mountbatten Drive in a cul-de-sac location being approximately 1.5 miles from Colchester City Centre and train station with direct links to London. The front door op..."
"A modern three bedroom town house, ideally situated to the south side of Colchester being within easy reach of local amenities and bus routes. The property offers good size accommodation, an early viewing is strongly advised to appreciate the accommodation on offer!"
"Beresfords are delighted to offer this fantastic 3 bedroom family home in a highly sought after location. Offering catchment of the sought after Gilberd secondary school and easy access to the A12, hospital, mainline train station to London and highwoods county park - this family home couldn't be..."
"A unique opportunity to purchase chain free this turn of the 19th century period property that retains a host of its original period features which include, sash windows, stripped interior doors, picture rails and fireplaces. The property is in need of renovation works to bring it back to it's fo..."
"FOUR FANTASTIC OFFERS AVAILABLE! * FLOORING & INTEGRATED APPLIANCES NOW INCLUDED * Ideal for first time buyers or growing families. STUNNING OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining area, with FRENCH DOORS to the rear garden. Separate UTILITY area and CLOAKROOM. Master is complete wi..."
****Investors Only**** Two bedroom Coach House located to the South of Colchester's historic City Centre. Offered in our opinion in exceptional decorative order. this is a must view for any Investor looking to add to their portfolio
"Guide Price £350,000 - £375,000. An immaculately presented two double bedroom townhouse arranged over three floors, which has undergone a full refurbishment by the current owners. Walking distance to the the city centre and mainline railway station."
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 ** This superb three bedroom modern home is situated on Gavin Way in Highwoods, offering excellent access to the A12, General Hospital and North station with it's mainline links to London Liverpool Street. The location is also positioned perfectly f..."
"A wonderful detached family home in a sought after cul-de-sac and North Colchester location. Three bedrooms, conservatory extension, garage and parking for multiple vehicles, great access to the A12, North Station, Colchester General Hospital and preferred schooling"
"*** OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £350,000 *** * THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME * EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM * NEWLY FITTED KITCHEN * GROUNDFLOOR CLOAKROOM * GARAGE TO THE REAR * CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS AND AMENITIES * SITUATED IN THE SOUGHT-AFTER AREA OF HIGHWOODS<..."
"Beresfords are excited to present this spacious three bedroom semi detached house boasting a brilliant location in the centre of Colchester, with no onward chain. Through the front door you are met by an entrance hall leading to a large lounge/diner featuring a bay window and sliding doors to the..."
"Offered for sale in the very heart of Stanway is this two bedroom detached bungalow. Stanway is popular for many reasons, mainly for its large array of local shops, amenities and highly regarded schools. Tollgate retail park is within easy reach and there are plenty of excellent public transpo..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000** We are delighted to offer this fantastic, extended character family home in one of Colchester’s most sought after roads. A road steeped in history and charm immediately next to the historic Colchester castle and its park and within ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £350,000 - £375,000 ** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Situated in the popular Old Heath Road area sits this deceptively spacious, three bedroom semi detached house. This great family residence is close to Colchester's City Centre and is within easy access to the stunning watersi..."
"Connells are pleased to bring to market this beautifully presented, three bedroom terraced property. This property is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN making it an ideal purchase for First Time Buyers."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this four double bedroomed end of terrace house, situated in this highly sought after area to the north of Colchester, with easy access to local schooling, the General Hospital and Colchester's mainline railway station with mainline links..."
"This beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached house is located within the popular location of New Town in Colchester, within walking distance to the city centre and train station with direct links to London Liverpool Street. As you enter the property there is a living room wi..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this modern three bedroom house, situated in this highly sought after area to the north of Colchester with easy access to local schooling, the General Hospital and Colchester's mainline railway station with mainline links to London Liverp..."
*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE - THURSDAY 11TH MAY - 11am – 4.30pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* A beautifully presented TWO bedroom second floor apartment with TWO BALCONIES with outlook towards the rear of the development. Lancer House is a retirement living plus development with an ON-SITE RE...
"Situated in a popular location close to all local amenities including supermarkets, shops and the A12 with links to Chelmsford and beyond sits this well presented, three bedroom detached family home. Colchester's City Centre is only a short drive away offering a further range of amenit..."
"Situated in a cul-de-sac position is this three bedroom family home on the popular Highwoods development within walking distance to the country park, Gilberd Secondary School and Tesco Superstore offering a good size garden and detached garage. "
"An enviable two double bedroom apartment, set within this excellent retirement complex, recently opened and offering high specification fitments throughout, with the benefit of supported living if required. This apartment is located on the second floor, with lift access and has the rare benefi..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £340,000 - £350,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this stunning three bedroom semi-detached house, situated to the north of Colchester, close to good primary and secondary schooling and shopping facilities. The A12 and Colchester Gen..."
"This property is ideally located in the popular area of Stanway, offering easy access to a wide range of local amenities, including shops, supermarkets, restaurants and schools. The nearby A12 provides easy access to other parts of Colchester and beyond, making this an ideal location for commuter..."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Semi Detached House Fitted Kit...
Situated to the south of Colchester and set back from the road is this three bedroom detached house with garage and parking.
"** IDEAL 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME ** This deceptively spacious, three bedroom semi detached house is an ideal family home in a great location. The interior has been refurbished to a contemporary finish and has been well looked after by the current owner. The property features two double bedrooms as ..."
"Chesterwell an area of Colchester that is fast becoming a community, close to all amenities including the newly built Chesterwell Plaza which will house a number of small retail outlets. Plenty of green open spaces to enjoy. Call Angela or Amanda and book an appointment. "
"Chesterwell an area of Colchester that is fast becoming a community, close to all amenities including the newly built Chesterwell Plaza which will house a number of small retail outlets. Plenty of green open spaces to enjoy. Call Angela or Amanda and book an appointment, new releases all the time."
"Saxons are delighted to offer this stunning duplex apartment located in arguably one of Colchester's most prestigious developments. Overlooking the River Colne and within walking distance of Castle Park and the City Centre, this spectacular property offers spacious and light accommodation........."
"Connells are pleased to present to market this well presented one bedroom apartment in south Colchester. This is a perfect investment property with tenant in situ. The property comprises of a modern fitted kitchen, a generously proportioned lounge/diner and double bedroom."
"(Apartment 19/Plot 17) McCarthy & Stone offers retirement living to the highest of standards. Raising the benchmark and exceeding all expectations, Lancer House is positioned in the heart of Colchester's City Centre and offers tranquil, peaceful and secure living within it's well equipped ..."
"Viewing is highly recommended. This wonderful *SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* is beautifully presented throughout providing *IDEAL ACCOMMODATION FOR GROWING FAMILIES*. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHN'S ESTATE* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
"New to the market is this mid-terraced town house with flexible accommodation comprising of four bedrooms, kitchen/diner, and separate lounge. There is a large driveway for numerous cars and due to its proximity to Essex University could make a worthwhile investment property. "
"NO CHAIN...we are pleased to offer for sale this four bedroom mid-terraced house situated just off Mersea Road. The property benefits from gas central heating (not tested by Elms Price and Co), double glazing and SOUTH FACING REAR GARDEN. Viewing is recommended. "
This is a rare and unique opportunity to own this well presented three bedroom penthouse apartment in the popular CO2 postcode of Colchester Town. With it's 49ft wide balcony and views over Colchester and the Hythe a viewing is highly recommended at your earliest convenience.
"Situated close to the city centre is this good size well presented three bedroom family home offering four piece bathroom, ensuite shower room, converted loft, well fitted kitchen and conservatory."
"A two bedroom semi-detached bungalow to the West of Colchester, with potential to extend to both the rear and side."
"**GUIDE PRICE £325,000-£350,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom detached bungalow, situated to the south of Colchester, providing easy access to local schools, shops, amenities and bus routes, as well as being a short drive from..."
"A North Colchester home of considerable stature with a layout that offers versatility. Three double bedrooms with the master taking up the whole of the ground floor, very generous wrap around (side and rear) garden, parking for multiple vehicles and garage. Chain free"
"Located in the popular Stanway, this two double bedroom home offers a modern finish and excellent space throughout."
"FINAL 2 BED ON THE DEVELOPMENT * 4 FANTASTIC OFFERS AVAILABLE! *  MASTER WITH EN SUITE SHOWER * 2 PARKING SPACES * 2 DOUBLE BEDS * SOUTH FACING GARDEN * SPACIOUS lounge, OPEN PLAN kitchen / dining area with FRENCH DOORS to the..."
"This charming *SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* making the *PERFECT HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES* with early viewing highly recommended. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHNS ESTATE* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, bus services and A12/A120."
"A luxury third floor penthouse apartment occupying a prime position overlooking Colchester's historic castle, set in the centre of Colchester's thriving High Street. "
"***Guide price of £325,000 - £350,000*** A chance to buy this three bedroom detached house located on the ever popular Solus Development on the South side of Colchester"
"Situated to the west of Colchester in the sought after location of Stanway and being offered for sale with no onward chain is this well presented two bedroom detached bungalow with generous bedrooms and living accommodation, ensuite to master bedroom, off road parking, garage, and garden. "
"*** Guide Price - £325,000 - £350,000 *** Located a short walk from Colchester Town Centre and all of its amenities is the Grade II listed townhouse, available with no onward chain. With many original features, including exposed beams and fireplaces,"
Now Offered to Private & Investment Buyers - this 5 bedroom HMO with student lets agreed for the 22/23 term is offered to private and investment purchasers please contact Upstix for further information.
"Step back in time and discover the charm of this beautifully refurbished Victorian home, featuring three/four bedrooms that are sure to capture your heart. While there may be no rear garden, the interior of this delightful property is simply bursting with character and style. As you step through ..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this beautifully presented three bedroom semi-detached family home, situated in the popular district of Stanway. An area desirable for those looking for good schooling, access to the A12 and an abundance of local amenities including Stane..."
"Guide Price £325,000-£350,000. Temme English are delighted to present this large three bedroom home situated within walking distance to the town centre and station, it is also close to open space with ‘Abbey Fields’ and the ‘Old Heath Recreat"
"*** INVESTMENT ONLY ***
** GUIDE PRICE OF £325,000 -£350,000 *** The Jackson and Co investment club is proud to deliver this excellent investment opportunity, located in the popular Hythe location and achieving a rental of £2,100pcm with a yield of 7.2% 7.7% , with five good sized..."
"Guide Price: £325,000 - £350,000. Oakheart are delighted to bring to the market this unique duplex coach house. The property is situated in the highly desirable area of Highwoods, with great access links to the ever-growing northern gateway development and the A12 all while being a short..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000 ** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Set in a prime location and offered to the market with no onward chain sits this well presented, three bedroom terraced house. Set within walking distance to the City Centre offering an array of amenities to enjoy plus the ma..."
"Located on the poplar Riverside development, this spacious three bedroom end of terrace family home offers ideal access to Colchester's city centre and Castle Park. The property benefits from spacious and well presented living accommodation throughout, front & rear gardens & allocated parking space."
"**GUIDE PRICE £290,000 TO £300,000** Connells are pleased to present to the market, in our opinion, this well presented three bedroom family home situated just one mile from Colchester’s Town Centre and a short walk from the popular Abbey Fields"
"This attractive modern terraced house, located in a prime position in Colchester, is exceptionally well-presented throughout and offers generous living accommodation, ample parking and garage, landscaped garden, and nature reserve views to the front. The property must be viewed to fully apprecia..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000 ** Set in a popular location close to local amenities and only a short drive away from Colchester's City Centre and the mainline train station sits this well presented, three bedroom detached family home. The accommodation is deceptively ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this well-presented four bedroom semi-detached property, situated to the south of Colchester. The property is conveniently located close to local schools, shops and amenities, as well..."
" This modern detached house to the south of Colchester offers an entrance hallway with cloakroom, lounge and kitchen/diner to the ground floor. On the first floor there are three bedrooms, a family bathroom and en-suite to the master bedroom. We also understand there is parking av..."
"This three bedroom semi detached family home is situated on the east side of Colchester within close proximity of local primary school. The property benefits from well presented and spacious living accommodation, three bedrooms, rear garden with outbuilding/office and off road parking for two cars."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this extended three/four bedroom semi detached house situated in the Shrub End to the south of Colchester. The property has been extended previously that has provided an additional living room or ground floor bedroom and a wet room. The accommodation comprise...
"East Links Residential are delighted to bring to the market this good sized Three Bedroom Family Home, located in the popular Riverside Estate and within close proximity of Colchester Town Centre."
"**GUIDE PRICE 325,000 - £350,000** Located close to Colchester Train Station is this exceptionally spacious home. Offering versatile accomodation and four bedrooms. REF(NBC220776)"
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market with no onward chain this well presented, three bedroom semi detached family home. Upon entering this residence you are welcomed by a generous driveway providing off road parking for multiple vehicles which in turn ..."
"Located in a sought after area is this three bedroom detached house. Available with no onward chain this would be a perfect family home. Situated close to amenities, schools and transport routes, this is a home you could really make your own. With a large lounge with dual aspect windows and acces..."
"
** INVESTMENT ONLY ** An impressive, five bedroom, licensed HMO located within easy access to Essex university, Hythe station, and local shops and amenities. The property is currently let for £2262 per calendar month and offers a yield of 8.3%."
"Early viewing is advised of this three bedroom detached family home having been renovated over the last few years by the owner. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three bedrooms, four piece family bathroom and enclosed rear garden measuring approx 100 ft."
"Saxons are offering this two bedroom detached bungalow located in the sought after Prettygate area on the west side of Colchester. Requiring some light modernisation/updating, this well proportioned property also benefits from ample off road parking with garage and is on offer with no onward chain."
"A well presented three bedroom semi-detached house with off road parking and an attractive established garden to the rear. Centrally located with easy access to local shopping amenities, Colchester Leisure World, Castle Park and Colchester North Station within one mile, offering direct..."
"**Guide Price £325,000 - £350,000** We are delighted to offer this well sized and extended three bedroom semi-detached house on the popular Westlands development in Stanway. Located near the picturesque Westlands Country Park and within walking distance of good schools and ..."
"What a lot it has got and what a plot it has got !! This three bedroom detached family home is in a prime non-estate location in North Colchester, perfectly poised for the A12, Colchester Hospital, North Station, Gilberd School and Turner Rise amenities. Check out the sweeping corner plot !!"
"A two bedroom semi-detached bungalow located on the popular west side of Colchester. The bungalow occupies a pleasant cul-de-sac position in this highly regarded area, with shopping facilities and amenities nearby for day to day needs. Tollgate Retail Park is a short distance away offe..."
"Guide Price of £325,000 - £350,000. Positioned to the south of Colchester, within close proximity to Abbey Fields offering plenty of outdoor facilities, is this three-bedroom family home. Also located close by is Colchester's Town Centre which offers an array of shops, restaurants and en..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £325,000 - £350,000 ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Situated in the heart of prime Lexden sits this stunning two bedroom duplex apartment. The immaculate accommodation has been designed to the highest of standards and offers versatile living throughout. The kitchen/living/dinin..."
Two Bedroom House - Modern Fitted Kitchen with Integral Appliances - Downstairs Cloakroom - Spacious Living Room with French Doors to Rear Garden - Two Double Bedrooms - Ensuite to Master Bedroom - Family Bathroom with Shower to Bath -
"Boydens are delighted to bring to market this spacious three bedroom Victorian residence, located to the North of Colchester on the highly sought after Nayland Road."
"Occupying an excellent position within easy reach of central Colchester and the A12 a modern two bedroom semi-detached house offering a tastefully decorated interior and benefitting from gas-fired central heating, off-road parking for a number of vehicles, en-suite shower room and a good size att..."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this deceptively spacious three bedroom house offering ample living accommodation throughout whilst residing on a generous plot with a sizeable rear garden. Positioned conveniently within the popular estate offering superb access to local shops and amenities ...
"The Kersey is a perfect FIRST HOME with TWO DOUBLE bedroom and an EN-SUITE to the Master bedroom. There is OPEN PLAN LIVING in the kitchen, dining and living area. Bedroom 2 could be used as a STUDY - great if you WORK FROM HOME, plus a GOOD SIZED BATHROOM. With the home is CARPORT PARKING"
"Early viewing is advised of this end of terrace house with NO ONWARD CHAIN, offering an excellent investment opportunity. The property benefits from shower room and bathroom, spacious living accommodation, five bedrooms, gardens and allocated parking for several cars."
"We are pleased to offer this investment opportunity which is currently producing a yield of approximately 10% per annum. The property has been converted into a house of multi occupation and consists of five bedrooms with two en-suites, communal kitchen and self contained studio with shower room. ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE OF £315,000 TO £325,000***This three bedroom family home is situated to the south of Colchester on a popular family orientated development. With spacious living accommodation, en-suite, private rear garden and off road parking.On the ground floor you wi..."
"Situated in the sought after area of POETS CORNER, a chance to acquire this three bedroom semi-detached house REQUIRING MODERNISATION THROUGHOUT. The property is on the west side of Colchester´s city centre and offers convenient access to the main A12 trunk road, Marks Tey and Colchester tr..."
"*IDEAL FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS!* Secure this brand new home today, complete with a CHAIN FREE MOVE, 10 year warranty and modern interior including an open plan living and dining room, and an EN SUITE to bedroom 1. The private gardens are also NOT OVERLOOKED and this home comes with 2 parking spaces."
"Perfectly proportioned, the Alnmouth has a stylish open-plan kitchen/dining/living room. It features flexible first-floor rooms, a good-sized family bathroom, handy storage cupboards and parking. Ideal if you are a first-time buyer looking for a fresh modern home you can make your own."
"** Guide Price £310,000 - £320,000 ** Beresfords are delighted to bring to market this exceptionally well presented, two bedroom semi-detached home. Located in the ever-popular Chesterwell development, this home is a must see. Having been maintained to an excellent standar..."
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Semi-Detached Townhouse – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £310,000 - £340,000*"
"We are proud to present this Four Bedroom Semi Detached Town House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £310,000 - £340,000*"
"Secure this brand new home today, complete with a CHAIN FREE MOVE, 10 year NHBC warranty and modern interior throughout including an open plan living and dining room, and an EN SUITE to bedroom 1. The private garden to this home is also NOT OVERLOOKED and this home comes with 2 parking spaces."
"This lovely semi-detcached home has much to offer. Located in Colchester, it boasts three bedrooms, two reception rooms and a double garage. It also offers ample off-road parking. This is the perfect opportunity for any home hunter. Viewing advised, we don't anticipate the property being on the ..."
"** Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000 ** Nestled in the popular district of Lexden is this spacious and well presented two bedroom bungalow. The bungalow boast two well appointed bedrooms, a spacious lounge with French doors providing access into a large sun room, a separate kitchen, and a..."
"**Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000** Located on the North side of Colchester stands this well presented, 3 bedroom home. This property has an abundance of offerings including easy access to the A12, within the catchment area for excellent schools, direct access to Highwoods Country Park and within..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated to the West of Colchester sits this deceptively spacious, two bedroom detached bungalow. In need of modernisation throughout this would be an ideal purchase for anyone looking to create a hou..."
"Situated to the North of Colchester close to the mainline train station with links to London Liverpool Street, shops and the city centre offering an array of amenities to enjoy sits this well presented, two bedroom semi detached house. The accommodation has been well looked after by t..."
"**Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000** Commanding an excellent position in Colchester's historic and vibrant city centre, offering peace and tranquillity and located off the very desirable Lexden Road, sits this deceptively spacious two-bedroom bungalow. Offered to the open market wit..."
"We are thrilled to present this beautifully refurbished three-bedroom semi-detached home, situated in the desirable North of Colchester. This charming property boasts easy access to Colchester Mainline station and direct routes into the city centre. Featuring a lovely bay-fronted design, this hom..."
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** ** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £320,000 ** Sittang Close is situated a short drive away from Colchester's City Centre offering an array of amenities to enjoy including shops, restaurants and public houses, a perfect buy for first time buyers looking to nestle down in ..."
"£300,000-£325,000 Guide Price. This fantastic *END-TERRACE HOUSE* is well-presented with *AMPLE ACCOMMODATION* making the *IDEAL HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES*. Situated in a *POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA* convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops the A12/A120. An early viewing is highly recommended."
"A quaint two bedroom semi-detached cottage dating back to the early 1900's and having been improved and upgraded sympathetically, whilst also incorporating modern and contemporary finishes. Residing to the much requested West side of Colchester and within easy access to an array of excellent p..."
"Residing in a quiet location in Stanway to the west side of Colchester is this two bedroom home, ideal for a first time buyer. The area is perfect for those looking for good access to the A12/A120, public transport links, good schooling and shopping facilities. Tollgate retail park and Stane P..."
"GUIDE PRICE £300,000-£325,000. Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* is well-presented throughout making the *PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated on the *SOUGHT-AFTER ST JOHNS ESTATE* the property is close to *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, bus services and A12/A120."
"Guide Price £300,000 to £325,000 ***Investment buyers only*** Offered in good decorative order throughout is this spacious property offering itself as an excellent investment purchaser due to its location close to the University of Essex with the potential to achieve a sizeable income."
"A priced to sell, chain free, detached bungalow with extensive parking, detached garage and in a prime Prettygate/Lexden location just yards from a local store, petrol station, chemist and post office and a short drive away from major stores"
Located on the very popular Highwoods development of Colchester is this three bedroom semi detached house
"* £300,000 to £325,000 Guide Price * Conveniently positioned within moments of Colchester's exciting and vibrant city centre, as well as a stones throw from Colchester's mainline station - offering links to London Liverpool Street within the hour, sits this excellent and deceptivel..."
"This 3 bedroom semi-detached Victorian property is located within walking distance from Colchester mainline train station, making it the perfect location for commuters. The property boasts an impressive 100+ft rear garden, providing a peaceful retreat from the hustle and bustle of city life. ..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom semi-detached home ideally located to the south-west of Colchester. The property's location offers convenient access to local shopping facilities, bus routes and Hamilton Primary School. Colchester's City centre is only a..."
"**Guide Price £300,000 to £325,000** - Offered for sale with no ongoing chain a well-presented three bedroom semi-detached house within easy reach of Colchester city centre and mainline railway station. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £300,000 to £325,000***Located in the heart of Stanway, a village to the west side of Colchester is this two/three bedroom family home. Offering a wealth of charm and character throughout coupled with a modern twist this property would make for the ideal f..."
"When only North will do... Superbly located family home providing exceptional access to the A12, North Station, The Hospital and Preferred Schooling. This is a chain free home too"
"**GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000** We are delighted to offer this modern 3 bedroom end of terrace home with off-road parking and good sized garden. Located within a short distance of the castle park, town centre, A12, train station, schools and local amenities. This proper..."
"Modern living at its best, The Morden's open plan kitchen, dining, living room is bright and ideal for the way we live today. Upstairs there are two nicely-proportioned bedrooms and a family-sized bathroom. Perfect for first-time buyers and young professionals."
"Stunning family home with three bedrooms, generous rear garden, close to the General Hospital and local amenities. This property is a must view!"
"When you need style AND substance, look here first... This family home has been extended to provide exceptional space for the growing family as well as 130' approx garden, a very useful loft room and off road parking. Call now to view good people, this home is superb in our opinion"
"PRICE GUIDE £300,000---£320,000---This two/three-bedroom, Victorian residence can be found in the ever-popular St Mary's area, which is within walking distance of Crouch Street's shopping parade. This characterful property boasts many original features with open fireplaces and stripped boards."
"Guide price £300,000 to £325,000 Situated in the ever popular district of Prettygate and being offered for sale with no onward chain is this three bedroom semi detached house in need of modernisation throughout. "
"***GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this spacious three bedroom semi-detached house, situated in the sought after area of Prettygate within easy access to local shops, amenities and ..."
"A well presented good size three bedroom double fronted family home a short distance to the University of Essex with a lounge, dining room, conservatory, useful utility room and attractive garden."
"** GUIDE PRICE £300,000 - £325,000 ** Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this very well presented and quaint, two/three bedroom terraced house. Situated in Lexden, down a popular road close to local amenities and only a short walk away from Colchester's City ..."
"Find this three bedroom family home in Stanway. Location here is perfect for those looking for popular schooling for both primary and secondary, access to the A12 and A120 for those commuting, plus an abundance of shopping and food outlets at both Tollgate  and Stane Retail Parks. As well..."
"**Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000** Commanding an elevated position this charming three bedroom bay fronted semi-detached home is situated in the heart of Colchester City, moments from the vibrant centre and home to an array of independent shops, restaurants, bars and leisure facil..."
"**Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000** Situated in the popular Highwoods/Mile End district, North of Colchester's city centre sits this deceptively spacious three/four bedroom terrace family home. Within striking distance of The Gilberd Secondary School, recently gifted with 'Outstand..."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this *EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE* provides *GENEROUS ACCOMMODATION* with the potential to make the *IDEAL FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"Guide Price £300,000-£325,000. With *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this fantastic *END TERRACE HOUSE* is well presented throughout making the *PERFECT HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, bus services, *VARIOUS SHOPS* and the A12/A120."
"Guide Price: £300,000 - £325,000 This well presented three bedroom semi-detached house is located within close proximity to Colchester Town centre. The property is a short walk to a number of independent shops and cultural sites including, galleries, museums, theatres, cinemas, and resta..."
"Guide Price: £300,000 - £325,000. Located to the south side of Colchester within easy reach of Mersea Island is this three bedroom family home. Location here is excellent as it is only a walk to the local primary school, excellent public transport links, easy access to local shops and o..."
"Early viewing is advised of this three bedroom character home situated on Bergholt Road. The property benefits from spacious open plan living accommodation, three bedrooms, first floor bathroom, large rear garden and allocated permit parking."
"What a home !! A superb family home to the North East of Colchester. Three bedrooms, impressive lounge, modern black gloss kitchen, utility/home office, cloakroom and attractive landscaped low maintenance garden. Do not miss out - call now"
"This charming *SEMI DETACHED HOUSE* is *BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* making the *PERFECT HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES* with early viewing highly recommended. Situated on the *POPULAR BROADLANDS ESTATE* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
"Harris + Wood are pleased to bring to the market this exceptionally well presented, two bedroom semi detached family home. The current owners have converted the garage into a large kitchen/diner, a great space for entertaining friends and family alike. This would be an ideal purchase ..."
Viewing Day Saturday 16th July 09:30-13:00 Appointment Needed Beautiful two bedroom terraced house located in the desirable area of St Marys in Lexden which is a short walk from the town centre
"Guide Price £300,000-£325,000. *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *DETACHED HOUSE* provides *AMPLE ACCOMMODATION* with the *POTENTIAL TO MAKE THE PERFECT FAMILY HOME*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* off Ipswich Road the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, *BUS ROUTES* the A12/A120."
"This is not to be missed !! An extended family home with generous garden, garage and parking located to the South of the City centre, close to the beautiful Bourne Mill. This is move ready too. Click to see more images and then call to view"
"Guide Price of £300,000 - £325,000. Positioned to the West of Colchester, in Stanway. This three-bedroom semi-detached property, The current owners have taken pride in presenting this home to its current standard with stylish decor as well as a modern kitchen & bathroom. The location here is idea..."
"Offered to market with no onward chain and positioned to the South of Colchester's city centre, on the 'St. Michaels' estate sits this spacious and recently upgraded four bedroom end of terrace family home. Ideal for the expanding family and offering a wealth of bedroom and living space throug..."
"Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000 This 3-bedroom terrace property is located in the desirable area of Highwoods, Colchester. The property features an open-plan living and dining area, providing a spacious and versatile living space for modern living. The property also boasts allocated park..."
"£300,000-£325,000 Guide Price. *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this charming *DETACHED FAMILY HOUSE* would make the *IDEAL HOME FOR GROWING FAMILIES*, viewing highly recommended. Situated in a *POPULAR LOCATION* and is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"Nestled on a modern popular development in the heart of Stanway is this stylish end terraced house, comprising of two double bedrooms, open plan living space, cloakroom, and family bathroom. Offering convenient A12 access and excellent shopping facilities of tollgate centre on your doorstep. "
"** *Guide Price £300,000 - £325,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well presented, two bedroom family home situated in the highly sought after area of Stanway, conveniently close to ample schools, shops and amenities with great access t..."
"An immaculate modern two bedroom end of terraced house situated in a cul-de-sac position in Stanway and offering a stylish newly fitted kitchen, shower room, garage, gardens, and superbly presented throughout."
"Ezemove Ezelet are delighted to offer for sale this three bedroom mid terraced Victorian house, situated in the sought after area of St Marys, and within walking distance to the City Centre. This property comprises of two double bedrooms and a single bedroom, open plan living room/diner, a galley..."
"This charming *TWO BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW* provides *IDEAL ACCOMMODATION* early viewing highly recommended. Situated at the end of a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* on the popular *ST JOHNS ESTATE* convenient for the *LOCAL PARADE OF SHOPS*, bus services and the A12/A120."
"An exciting three bedroom family home in a lovely location just yards from Friday Wood itself. Ground floor cloakroom, impressive kitchen/diner, conservatory extension and a the former garage that has been extended and converted to a gym/bar and cinema room"
"This excellent *SEMI DETACHED HOUSE* is particularly *WELL PRESENTED* making the *IDEAL HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS* with viewing highly recommended. Situated on the *POPULAR HIGHWOODS ESTATE* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
" This stunning three bedroom terraced property is ideal for commuters and families alike- with spaciousness throughout and great transport links, this property needs to be seen. The property has three generously sized bedrooms, with one boasting an ensuite as well as having a fami..."
"This beautifully presented home is ideally located in a sought-after location with easy access to a wide range of amenities with shops, restaurants, bars, and a good selection of local schools including the Outstanding rated Home Farm Primary School among others to cater to all ages, There are go..."
"Temme English are delighted to present this good sized three bedroom semi-detached home positioned on a corner plot with GATED ENTRANCE, DRIVEWAY FOR AMPLE PARKING AND GARAGE. Situated to the South of Colchester in an"
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £290,000 - £310,000 ***
* POTENTIAL FOR £2000pcm RENTAL INCOME * Jackson and Co have the pleasure of offering this very attractive three bedroom apartment with terrace, as well as stunning river views, underground parking for two cars, two en-suites, separate fa..."
Two Bedroom apartment situated close to Colchester Station
"Situated on the popular West side of Colchester in Stanway is this well-presented and cosmetically improved two double-bedroom end-of-the-terrace home with the addition of an outbuilding currently used as an office, boasting full power and electrics. As you enter the property, you will f..."
"Situated in a popular location in Stanway and within close proximity to an array of local amenities, Tollgate Retail Park, bus routes and the A12 is this very well presented, two bedroom, end of terrace house. The current owner has created such a beautiful home throughout and would be ideal for a..."
"Situated in a sought after location, this sizeable three bedroom home boasts a welcoming entrance way, spacious lounge, modern fitted kitchen, dining room and family bathroom. Whilst the first floor offers three double bedrooms. Externally the home benefits from a rear garden and the corner plot ..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000** We are delighted to offer this fantastic two bedroom semi-detached house, on the sought after Mile End Road. Located within a short walk of the train station, General hospital, Oaks hospital and local amenities; as well as a short drive ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this three bedroom semi-detached house, situated conveniently close to Colchester's historic city centre, with good access to the A12 and Railwa..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this three bedroom property, situated in the prestigious development of The Mill Apartments, providing excellent access to Colchester City Centre, local amenities and train stations wit..."
"Located to the south of Colchester town centre is this well presented three bedroom modern home backing onto Friday Woods, offering a refitted kitchen, large conservatory, ground floor cloakroom, spacious under stairs storage, modern bathroom suite with gas central heating and double glazing."
Situated in the popular New Town area of Central Colchester is this well presented three bedroom terraced home which boasts a spacious open plan living area and a single detached garage
"** GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000 ** Harris + Wood are delighted to present to the market this well presented two bedroom semi detached home, situated in the popular and sought after Highwoods area to the north of the City, providing excellent access to the A12, Gilberd School, Gener..."
Offered with no onward chain and requiring modernisation and refurbishment is this two bedroom detached bungalow situated in a cul-de-sac position on the popular St Johns development to the north of Colchester.
"Guide Price £290,000 - £300,000 Oakheart Property is pleased to offer the market this rare opportunity to buy this stylish two-bedroom ground-floor apartment, located conveniently close to North Station with its mainline links to London Liverpool Street and Colchester's historic city ce..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £290,000 - £300,000*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this two bedroom detached bungalow, situated in the sought after Highwoods area to the north of Colchester. The property is located close to local shops, Post Office, doctors surgery, H..."
"Bright and Spacious, this beautiful three bedroom semi detached home is located in the south of Colchester is a fantastic home for first time buyers and families alike. With its gated drive, three bedrooms, separate diner with Kitchen & Lounge. We would highly recommend viewing to avoid disap..."
"**Guide price £290,000 - £315,000** We are delighted to offer this generously sized, extended three bedroom end of terraced home. Offering good road links to local amenities and the A12, this home is well situated. Downstairs there is a generous three room setup..."
"William H Brown are pleased to offer for sale this three bedroom mid terrace town house situated in the New Town area of Colchester, offering convenient access to the town centre and train station. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three bedrooms, en suite, garden & parking."
"Pantera Property offer to the market a three-bedroom mid terraced house, providing a rear garden."
"NO CHAIN! Temme English are delighted to present this three bedroom home situated on a large plot with further potential to enhance and expand. The property boasts large lounge, kitchen/diner, outside toilet and fanta"
"Guide price £280,000 to £290,000. An extremely well presented two bedroom detached bungalow situated to the west of Colchester in the sought after district of Stanway. The bungalow comprises of a modern fitted kitchen, spacious lounge/dining room, two generous bedrooms, a bathroom, driv..."
"COMPLETE CHAIN, A fantastic example of a spacious three bedroom family home or FANTASTIC investment opportunity. Situated in this popular location with local schooling nearby for a family or the University stones throw for INVESTMENT! "
"An excellent example of an extended three bedroom semi-detached family home, conveniently positioned to the South of Colchester and within walking distance of a variety of schooling and useful amenities. Well presented & offering a wealth of space throughout, the ground floor accommodation..."
"Sat in the heart of Colchester, a short drive away from the City Centre and Mersea Island offering a beautiful seafront to enjoy with ample amenities on offer sits this three bedroom semi detached family home. The sitting room situated to the rear of the property is a great space to enjoy, with F..."
"Guide Price of £280,000 to £300,000. Situated to the West of Colchester in the district of Stanway, this spacious home is perfectly placed within easy reach of a selection of amenities, popular schooling and transport links making it a great location for multiple reasons. Internally the property ..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £280,000 - £290,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom end of terrace house, situated in the highly sought after area of Stanway. The property's location provides easy access to excellent local schools, the A12 and Stanwa..."
"NO ONWARD CHAIN - Martin & Co, Colchester are pleased to present this MODERN, two double bedrppm, Mews house with off road allocated parking and within close proximity to the City train station and is located in the heart of Colcheser City. *VIEWINGS BY APPOINTMENT ONLY*"
Early viewing is advised of this attractive family home situated off Hythe Hill and offering spacious accommodation throughout. The property is well presented and benefits from enclosed rear garden and two allocated parking spaces.
"** GUIDE PRICE 280,000 - £290,000 ** Located in the heart of Highwoods is this immaculately presented, two double bedroom, end of terrace home. Having been maintained excellently by the current owners the home is ready to move straight in. On the ground floor there is a good siz..."
"We are proud to offer this Three Bedroom End Terrace House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £280,000 - £290,000*"
Stunning four bedroom mid-terraced house located to the North of Colchester's City Centre. Offering a perfect family home as well as an addition to a buy to let portfolio. Finished in impressive decorative order and ready to be moved into
"We are pleased to offer this three bedroom family home located in the popular Longridge area, within close proximity of local schools, The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three good size bedrooms & large rear garden with potential for parking."
"GUIDE PRICE £275,000 to £285,000
This extended two bedroom end of terrace property features two bathrooms along with sun room/conservatory and a detached garage/work shop.  There is an exceptonally large corner plot offering excellent potential."
"This two/three bedroom property situated within walking distance of Colchester's north station features a large wedge shaped garage/workshop and a rear garden in excess of 100 feet in length, is offered for sale on a chain free basis.  Key available for viewing."
"East Links Residential are delighted to bring to the market this Three Bedroom House, located within a short distance of Colchester Mainline Railway Station and Colchester Town Centre"
"FREEHOLD COUNCIL TAX BAND C ****TENANTS IN SITU**** We are delighted to offer to the market this pleasant 3-bedroom mid terraced house on Ladbrook Drive, Colchester. The property offers a well-adapted layout, offering spacious and comfortable accommodat..."
INVESTOR SALE VIEWINGS FROM 14/11/22. A lovely two bedroom end terrace house in the incredibly popular Roberts Road/Abbey Fields area. With tenants in residence and viewings from the 14th/11/22 this one NOT to be missed
"This semi detached house is situated on the Greenstead Estate, offering excellent access to local amenities and University of Essex. The property is offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN and would be an ideal INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY, being currently let out to students."
"Guide Price of £275,000 - £300,000. A spacious penthouse apartment which is situated within a popular Western Homes development to the East of Colchester. The property itself is within a short walk to the University of Essex, Hythe train station with Links to London Liverpool Street and a large T..."
"This executive two double bedroom, first floor apartment is located in the highly desirable area of Braiswick, an area popular with families and professionals alike, with Colchester North Station a short drive away and an abundance of other amenities. This aesthetically pleasing block of apart..."
3 bedroom semi-detached family home in North Colchester. This perfect first time home is offered for sale with no onward chain
"We are delighted to offer this apartment situated off one of Colchester´s most sought after roads. The property benefits from two bedrooms, sitting room with French doors onto an enclosed garden, en-suite shower room to master, bathroom, kitchen and utility room. It also benefits from gas h..."
"Located in New Town is this spacious three bedroom, semi detached home. Offering excellent potential, the home is also just a short walk away from Colchester’s City Centre with an array of restaurants and shops with both Colchester City and Hythe Train Stations just a short walk away."
"* Guide Price - £275,000 to £300,000 * An excellent example of a deceptively spacious two bedroom, ground floor maisonette. Residing in the iconic 'Bell Tower', an imposing Grade II listed property, meticulously refurbished & reimagined by renowned local developers 'Knights Gro..."
"Early viewing is advised of this modern and well presented upper floor apartment situated in Captain Gardens. The property benefits from open plan living accommodation, two good size bedrooms, modern bathroom and allocated parking."
"A charming attached Grade II Listed cottage, of some character, occupying a superb position in Lexden Road adjacent to Spring Lane Park."
"A two bedroom semi-detached house located in the popular area of Highwoods, with a range of amenities and schools nearby. The property offers an entrance hallway, lounge, kitchen/diner and spacious conservatory overlooking the garden. Upstairs there are two double bedrooms and a family..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this beautiful two bedroom maisonette situated in the west of Colchester, close to Colchester's historic City Centre, popular schooling, access to the A12 and an abundance of amenities. The first floor of the property compris..."
"**Guide Price £270,000 - £280,000** An excellent opportunity has arisen to purchase this deceptively spacious two bedroom middle terrace home, situated in the favourable district of St Marys, in the heart of Colchester's historic and vibrant city centre. Offered to market with no o..."
"** OFFERED WITH NO ONWARD CHAIN** ** GUIDE PRICE £270,000 - £280,000 ** This well presented, three bedroom end of terrace house is within walking distance to Colchester's City Centre offering an array of amenities to enjoy including restaurants, public houses, shops and also the mainl..."
"This end of terrace house is situated on the south side of Colchester and could be an ideal family home. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, three good size bedroom, front & rear gardens, on road parking and the potential to hire a garage from the local council."
"**Guide Price £265,000 to £275,000** Situated to the South of Colchester is this deceptively spacious three bedroom middle terrace home, offering an abundance of both reception and bedroom space throughout. Within easy access of a range of local amenities and choice of schooling, t..."
A two bedroom apartment set within this highly desirable development on the fifth floor with astounding views overlooking the River Colne. This luxurious apartment is within close proximity to Hythe Station and Essex University and boasts one allocated parking space with well maintained commun...
"A three bedroom terraced property is situated in a convenient location, with plenty of local amenities close by. The house is east of the city centre, providing easy access to the centre and the surrounding areas."
"An exciting and rare opportunity to purchase a wonderfully positioned and well presented ground floor apartment in the Old Lexden district of Colchester. Just yards from the shops, bars and restaurants in the town centre this home has it all and more"
"GUIDE PRICE £260,000 to £270,000
We have pleasure in offering for sale this two bedroom semi detached cottage situated conveniently for both the Town Centre and Colchester's North Station with its fast and frequent service to London Liverpool Street.  Fea..."
"This Three bed semi detached property situated within walking distance of Colchester North station.  Offer for sale on a chain free basis, keys available.
 "
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £260,000 - £270,000 ***
** POTENTIAL RENTAL OF £1500pcm **
* YIELD OF 6.6% - 6.9% * Located in the popular Hythe area is this modern two bedroom high end apartment. The property benefits from being walking distance to Essex university, local shops and amenities...."
"NO CHAIN! We are delighted to present this two bedroom, Grade two listed, home situated within the popular 'Dutch quarter' in Colchester's popular city centre"
"** GUIDE PRICE 250,000 - £275,000 ** Being offered with no onward chain is this five bedroom mid-terraced Grade II listed property within walking distance of Colchester high street. The property is in need of modernisation, however the current owner has made a number of upgrades ..."
"*Guide Price £250,000-£260,000* Situated in the heart of Highwoods sits this excellent two bedroom middle terrace home. Presenting itself as this ideal first time purchase, this two bedroom home is within walking distance of Highwoods Square - home to a Tesco Extra store, doctors/d..."
A rarely available semi detached bungalow in ever popular Highwoods. The property has a tenant in situ currently paying £875pcm and will be bought as an investment purchase
"Offers in Excess of £250,000. Walk To Colchester North Station, Colchester Castle Park and the Town Centre + Off Road Parking !! Two bedroom end terrace house perfectly located and an ideal buy to live or buy to let. Chain Free Too !!"
"A versatile and impressive three bedroom riverside duplex apartment with lift, balcony and parking. superbly located for the town centre and Colchester mainline station. Being sold with a tenant in situ as a going concern; rent specifics are available on request"
"INVESTMENT PURCHASE Two bedroom end terrace home with garage on the highly desirable Highwoods development. Currently let and to be bought as a going concern. Viewing from March, more details available from the branch"
A rare opportunity is available to acquire a building plot located to the South-East of Colchester's exciting city centre and is complete with full planning permission in a favourable residential area. The planning permission granted is for a substantial and aesthetically pleasing five bedroom...
Three Bedroom Terraced House - Available as Investment Only - 4.8 Return - Town Centre Location - Lounge with Feature Fireplace - Good sized Dining Room - Fitted Kitchen - Cont.....
"Standing near the river itself and close to the city centre is this immaculate family home. Beautifully presented with two bedrooms, off street parking for 2/3 cars, spacious open plan kitchen/living area and cosy lounge, it has a light, airy interior and a delightful riverside location. Its pro..."
"Situated in the popular New Town area and being within walking distance to Colchester town centre, is this well presented two bedroom end terrace house."
"Palmer and Partners are delighted to present to the market this impressive two bedroom Coach house. The property is situated in a tucked away position within walking distance of Colchester’s historic town centre, Castle park and the Hythe railway station. The accommodation is extremely well..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £250,000 - £275,000 *** Jackson & Co are delighted to present to the market, this two bedroom semi-detached house situated close to Abbey Fields and Colchester town centre and Colchester station. The property benefits from being in excellent condition with two re..."
A two bedroom semi-detached house is situated at the end of a peaceful cul-de-sac and offers the perfect combination of convenience and privacy.
"**GUIDE PRICE £170,000-£180,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to present to the market this two bedroom apartment, situated to the south of Colchester within easy access of schools, shops and local amenities. Internall..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £250,000-£260,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this three bedroom semi-detached house dating back to the 1800's. Located in this sought after area to the west of Colchester, conveniently close ..."
* Two Bedroom * Second Floor Modern Apartment * No Onward Chain * Open Plan Lounge/Diner/Kitchen * Balcony * Lift * Allocated Parking * Popular The Bridge Development
"Now fully available to view CHAIN FREE, smart and modern two bedroom home close to Abbey Fields with allocated parking and located on an attractive walkway in our opinion"
"Guide Price: £250,000-£275,000. Offered for sale with no onward chain, Oakheart Property are delighted to present to the market this three/four bedroom semi-detached house, situated to the south of Colchester within walking distance to Abbey Fields, Colchester train station with mainline links to..."
Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer sale this stunning penthouse located in a prime position at the heart of the city centre. With delightful open plan living areas leading to a large balcony with superior and commanding views over the town centre and........
BRAND NEW Park Home (40'x20') | Residential development | Over 50s | Pet friendly | Fully furnished | Driveway | Shops and amenities nearby | Bottles gas | Great position | Corner plot | Semi retirement | Community living for like minded people | Coming soon
" Brand new 40' x 20' Prestige Sonata sited at Grange Farm Park. Grange Farm Park is a well-established family owned residential semi-retirement park estate just a half a mile from the historic walled town of Colchester in Essex. Comprising of 61 homes, this gently sloping estate has just been ful..."
"Viewing Reference: MC0527 -- VIRTUAL TOUR AVAILABLE !!!  -- Situated on the highly sought after 'Pracedo Development' we are delighted to bring to market this well presented two bedroom freehold coach house. The home boasts open plan living space, two well proportioned bedrooms, b..."
"This two bedroom, very modern coach house is perfect for anyone looking to be close to local amenities or commuters looking for an out of city retreat. The current owners have created such a beautiful home throughout and would be perfect for anyone looking to move straight into a property without..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £240,000-£250,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this three bedroom semi-detached house, situated to the popular west side of Colchester. The location of the property gives easy access to Tollgate Re..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market three bedroom terraced house, situated to the south of Colchester providing excellent access to nearby schools, shops and amenities. The prope..."
"Offered with No Onward Chain is this two/three bedroom mid-terraced property well located within walking distance of Colchester town centre, Colchester castle park and also Colchester North mainline railway station."
A two bedroom end terrace house located in ever popular North Colchester. The property has been improved by the current owners over the years and if you love your garden then you have found your heaven on earth
"Nestled on a popular modern development in Stanway is this beautifully presented two bedroom detached coach house. The property benefits from a spacious open plan lounge/kitchen/dining room, two generous bedrooms, ensuite to master, separate bathroom, and two parking spaces. "
"** TENANTS IN SITU - ATTENTION INVESTORS ** ** GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000 ** This two bedroom first floor coach house is located in the highly popular area of Stanway. Within walking distance to local primary and secondary schools, Tollgate Retail Park and within easy access to t..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £240,000 - £250,000** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this two bedroom terraced property, situated within close proximity of Colchester's historic city centre. The property's location offers excellent access to local amenities including ..."
This fantastic 2 bedroom mid terrace property is only a short walk to the town centre and both Colchester Stations. Internally it has been well maintained and has a modern feel with two double bedrooms on the second floor and lovely shower room.
"One bedroom character cottage set in the popular district of Lexden with modernised kitchen, shower room and courtyard garden."
"Goodmove are delighted to present this three bedroom end terrace home for a quick sale. Located in an popular residential area in the South of Colchester close to a range of useful shops, schools and amenities including Mersea Road Clinic, Thomas Lord Audley secondary school, Monkwick J..."
***Investors only*** Connells are pleased to bring to market this two double bedroom apartment in the heart of Colchester.
"Whether you are looking buy to let or buy to live - look no further. Ideally located close to local amenities, Colchester Town station and Colchester City Centre this two bedroom home has been loved by the current family owners and is now available chain free"
" *** GUIDE PRICE OF £230,000 - £250,000 *** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Jackson and Co are delighted to present to the market this family home situated down a quiet cul-de-sac to the south/west of Colchester. The property also offers two allocated parking spaces to front. Once inside you..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE - THURSDAY 11TH MAY - 11am – 4.30pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* *Viewings advised* One bedroom GROUND floor apartment with PATIO area, situated within the popular McCarthy & Stone's Retirement Living PLUS development."
"Investors only - tenants in situ. Situated to the East of Colchester is this well appointed 2 bedroom mid terraced house, located close to Colchester Hythe railway station. This property would make an ideal purchase for investors."
INVESTMENT PURCHASE ONLY...a two bedroom COACH HOUSE STYLE PROPERTY benefiting from carport and its own private garden. CURRENT TENANT PAYING £825.00 PCM. Agents note: all photos taken prior to current tenancy. 
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this this bedroom terrace house which is situated in the popular New Town area of Colchester within easy reach of the Town Centre and Colchester Town Train Station. The owner has recently had a new combination boiler installed and has started commencement on o...
"Easy like Sunday morning !! Looking for that easy investment property purchase? How about a spacious three bedroom apartment in possibly one of the most sought after areas in Colchester with a tenant in residence? I know, dreams do come true ! Call or click to view"
"**Guide Price £230,000 - £240,000** **No Onward Chain** Situated in the sought after St. Mary's estate this modern three bedroom flat is looking for it's next owner. Offered with no onward chain, the property benefits from a great amount of internal space and allocated..."
"(Apartment 1) McCarthy & Stone offers retirement living to the highest of standards. Raising the benchmark and exceeding all expectations, Lancer House is positioned in the heart of Colchester's City Centre and offers tranquil, peaceful and secure living within it's well equipped complex. ..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £230,000 - £240,000 ** Situated in the heart of Colchester, close to the city centre offering an ample range of shops, restaurants and public houses to enjoy sits this well presented, two bedroom terraced house. Perfect for a young family or first time buyers the accomm..."
" Brand new 40' x 20' Stately Albion Badminton sited at Grange Farm Park. Grange Farm Park is a well-established family owned residential semi-retirement park estate just a half a mile from the historic walled town of Colchester in Essex. Comprising of 61 homes, this gently sloping estate has just..."
"The Centurion offers the best of modern living with a spacious open plan kitchen/living room, two good-sized bedrooms (bedroom one benefiting from an en suite), a main bathroom and two handy storage cupboards. Perfect for first-time buyers and investors."
ATTENTION INVESTORS - SUPERB BUY-TO-LET INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN A GREAT LOCATION! A spacious three-bedroomed terraced property in the popular town of Colchester. Don't miss out and enquire today.
We are delighted to market this Victorian two bedroom mid-terrace house within a five minute walk of Colchester´s historic city centre. The property is available with no onward chain. Excellent first time purchase or investment opportunity. 
"GUIDE PRICE £225,000-£235,000 For this BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED. two double bedroom ground floor apartment located within the original grounds of Abbey Gate and just a short walk from Colchester's City centre and Town railway Station. Feeling beautifully light and spacious, the apartment is of an o..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £225,000 - £235,000 ** Situated in a popular location sits this exquisite, two double bedroom ground floor apartment, located within close proximity to Colchester's bustling City Centre offering an abundance of local shops, high street stores, train station with direct ..."
"Priced to sell home with parking, just outside of Colchester town centre. Be quick, whether you are looking buy to let or buy to live, this home will sell"
"INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* Martin & Co are pleased to present this UNFURNISHED, top floor, two double bedroom apartment with a single garage located in the popular St Marys development in the heart of Colchester town centre. *Currently Tenanted until Sept 2023*"
"Located on the sought after Grange Farm Park in the popular Old Heath area of the south easterly part of Colchester, is this BRAND NEW TWO BEDROOM DETACHED fully residential LUXURY PARK HOME for the over 50's. It benefits from an en-suite to the master bedroom, allocated parking and its own priva..."
"New to the market this brand new park home. Located on a private residential site on the eastern side of Colchester, with easy access to supermarkets, local shops and resturants, bus service to Colchester town centre. Access to the riverside village of Rowhedge with its walks and Public Houses."
"Located in a highly desirable location within a stone's throw from Colchester North Station, mainline to London Liverpool Street, close proximity to Colchester General Hospital and within walking distance to the town centre, is this previously used convenience store with planning permission for a..."
"*JOIN US FOR COFFEE & CAKE - THURSDAY 11TH MAY - 11am – 4.30pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* A bright and spacious one bedroom retirement apartment on the first floor, 1st apartment next to the lift. Double glazed opening door leads onto A SPACIOUS BALCONY. This development has a beautiful B..."
"NO CHAIN! We are delighted to present this chain free two bedroom home situated close to the popular Abbey fields, stones throw to the City centre/station and local schooling. "
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £220,000 - £230,000 *** Jackson and Co are pleased to announce to the market this coach house, with the very unique benefit of having a garage with light and power as well as a driveway and private rear garden. The property makes the ideal purchase for a first tim..."
"Two bedroom terrace house within 0.6 miles to Colchester North Station, 1.5 miles to Colchester Hospital and, 2.8 miles to A12. Newly redecorated and with new carpets and vinyl flooring."
"***INVESTMENT ONLY - TENANT IN SITU PAYING £850.00 PCM***BEING SOLD AS PART OF A BUY TO LET PORTFOLIO*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this two bedroom semi-detached house, situated in the sought after location of Highwoods to the north of Colchester. The p..."
"Connells are very excited to bring to market this fantastic three bedroom house on Old Heath Road. Perfect for first time buyers and investors, book your viewing now to avoid disappointment."
 Blackwater Estates are pleased to bring to the market this extremely spacious two double bedroom first floor apartment situated in the sought after location of Prettygate and close to all amenities. The property benefits from new decoration throughout as well as new flooring. The apartment has...
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY - Martin & Co are pleased to present this MODERN, two bedroom, FURNISHED Coach House, with furniture included to the high standard, only 5 minutes walk to North Station and Colchester Hospital. PROPERTY TENANTED"
Boydens are pleased to bring to the market this two-bedroom duplex apartment/mews house.
"A chance to acquire this beautiful two bedroom mews house forming part of this fabulous conversion, set within the heart of Colchester Town Centre. Packed with charm, the property boasts a wealth of exceptionally spacious accommodation over two floors. An impressive entrance hall featuring an ori..."
"Offers to market with no onward chain, is this deceptively spacious two bedroom coach house, positioned favourably to the North of Colchester and within striking distance Colchester's mainline station, offering links to London Liverpool Street. This home also resides within close proximit..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £220,000 ** Located on the Southern side of Colchester within 2 miles of the city centre, this modern two bedroom apartment located on the fourth floor. The property is offered in 'as new' condition and features include; built-in media wall, Juliet balcony, allocated par..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £230,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated close to the picturesque Abbey Fields and Colchester's City Centre offering an array of shops and restaurants sits this well presented one bedroom, first floor retirement apartment. The accom..."
"**Cash buyers only** ***Guide Price £210,000 - £230,000*** Situated close to the University of Essex is this spacious and profitable five bedroom apartment achieving a yield of over 6.5%. Ideally located on the Beyond the Box complex there are many per..."
"* Cash buyers only * ***Guide Price £210,000 - £230,000*** Situated close to the University of Essex is this spacious and profitable five bedroom apartment. Ideally located on the beyond the box complex there are many perks that come to students rentin..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £210,000 - £220,000*** Situated to the south of Colchester City Centre, this immaculate first-floor apartment makes it perfect for a first-time or investment purchase. The property is within walking distance of Colchester City Centre and Colchester Town train station, whic..."
"GUIDE PRICE £210,000---£220,000---This light and spacious ground-floor duplex maisonette is situated in a prime city centre location overlooking the River Colne, within walking distance of the railway station. "
"Offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN, original 999 YEAR LEASE and no annual maintenance charges, this purpose built ground floor maisonette with private rear gardens would suit the buyer who is looking to put their own stamp on their new home. Benefitting from expansive private gardens to the fr..."
"**Guide Price £210,000 - £220,000** A stunning two bedroom duplex ground floor apartment, forming part of this superb modern development, set within striking distance of the Town Centre and North Station. The property is presented to the market in exceptional order throughout and m..."
"This stunning two bedroom town centre apartment was built in 2018 and is situated within walking distance of the train station and local amenities. The property benefits from open plan living, two double bedrooms, en suite & allocated parking."
Wonderful 3 bedroom detached house in the Castellum Grange development. The price advertised represents purchasing a 50% share of the home
"** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Quayside Drive is perfectly situated close to both the University of Essex and Colchester's City Centre which offers an ample range of shops, restaurants and other amenities plus the mainline train station with links to London Liverpool Street. The accommodation ..."
"A well-presented and spacious apartment situated in the sought after area of New Braiswick Park. The property benefits from two double bedrooms, en-suite, lounge with Juliet style balcony and allocated parking space. EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY OR FIRST TIME PURCHASE. "
A stunning starter home located in a non estate position to the South of Colchester and with beautiful Bourne Pond and Mill on your doorstep. Put your furniture down and enjoy your first home !!
"** PART BUY PART RENT ** £200,000 is for a 50% share purchase, the full property price is £400,000. The minimum CASH DEPOSIT you will need is £80,000 Turn any freehold property into part buy –part rent with Leaders Estate Agents and ‘Your Hom..."
"***COMING SOON*** This charming, recently improved two bedroom mid terraced property is located in the desirable Goring Road area of Colchester. The property features a spacious and inviting lounge area, perfect for relaxing or entertaining guests. The kitchen is well-equi..."
NO CHAIN! Temme English are delighted to present this one bedroom home with private rear garden positioned in an ever popular spot located in Highwoods
"Early viewing is advised of this modern two bedroom second floor apartment offering excellent access to Abbey Fields. The property offers good size living accommodation, two bedrooms, en suite and allocated parking."
"Early viewing is advised of this well presented refurbished top floor apartment situated in the heart of Colchester, within walking distance of shops, restaurants and facilities. The property benefits from spacious living accommodation, two bedrooms and secure allocated parking."
"***GUIDE PRICE £200,000 - £210,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this well presented, two bedroom coach house, situated conveniently close to ample schools, shops, amenities and transport links including Asda Superstore, Tesco Extra, Colchester H..."
"A stunning two bedroom apartment forming part of this highly sought after development, set adjacent to Abbey Fields and within walking distance of the Town Centre and Station. The property was constructed in 2017 to an excellent specification and features an array of stylish and spacious accommod..."
"Guide Price £200,000-£210,000. Temme English are delighted to present this ready to move in to two bedroom TOP FLOOR flat offered with NO CHAIN . The property boasts two double bedrooms one benefiting from En-Suite, a spacious lounge through to kit"
"GUIDE PRICE £200,000 to £210,000. Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this attractive older style property located within a short walk of the City Centre. Currently with a tenant in situ, the property would ideally suit an investor purchaser. "
"Game Estates are delighted to offer this thoroughly modern, spacious apartment ***BEAUTIFULLY FINISHED*** situated in the desirable Stanway area, close to amenities including a minutes walk to a 24 hour gym. Two double bedrooms, master with En-suite. Fully fitted kitchen with Integrated appliance..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £200,000 - £225,000 *** An outstanding two bedroom maisonette located minutes from the Hythe with excellent reach for the Essex university. The property offers parking, two bathrooms a Juliet balcony and has been completed to a high standard. Jackson and Co advise an..."
** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** Tenant in situ presently achieving £875.00 per calendar month. Superb investment opportunity on this NEARLY NEW luxury apartment situated within the heart of Colchester City Centre. ***BEAUTIFULLY FINISHED*** Luxurious TWO bedroom apartment situated in a sought after ...
"*INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY* Martin & Co are pleased to present this MODERN, top floor, two double bedroom apartment with private South/West corner balcony and allocated parking available within close proximity to the Essex University and the local supermarket. *Property tenanted until August 202..."
"This is not your usual 2 bed apartment, offering very generous internal accommodation, outside terrace and offered for sale with no onward chain. Ideally suited for First time buyers and investors"
"Presenting a two bedroom coach house on the south side of colchester, built on the recent Solus development. This home is located close to great transport links, town centre and Colchester Zoo."
"Great value this Two bedroom first floor apartment with En- Suite to the main Bedroom, Spacious Living room, leading on to a good sized Balcony. Open plan Kitchen. overlooking lawned gardens. Within easy walking distance to Colchester North Main line Station to London Liverpool Street, Bus servic..."
"A stunning two bedroom apartment in a highly sought after development, set adjacent to Abbey Fields. The property was built in 2017 to a high specification and features a plethora of stylish and spacious accommodation throughout."
"Located in the popular Abbey Field area of Colchester, this beautifully presented, ground-floor apartment offers accommodation comprising open plan living kitchen, principal bedroom with ensuite shower room, further double bedroom and bathroom. The property also benefits from one allocated parki..."
"Purplebricks are delighted to offer this immaculately presented two bedroom apartment which has undergone a complete refurbishment by the current owners which includes a new kitchen, bathroom, en-suite, new flooring and redecoration. The accommodation comprises: entrance hall with storage cupboa..."
"2 bedroom park home in the historic town of Colchester close to local amenities including shops, post office and Tesco Superstore just a few mins drive . This beautiful park home is ideal for t..."
Purplebricks are delighted to offer this immaculately presented two bedroom first floor apartment which has been much improved recently by the current owners with a new kitchen fitted with solid wood work tops and general decoration carried out which gives this flat a nice fresh feel. Located of...
"** PART BUY PART RENT ** £195,000 is for a 50% share purchase, the full property price is £390,000. The minimum CASH DEPOSIT you will need is £80,000 Turn any freehold property into part buy –part rent with Leaders Estate Agents and ‘Your Hom..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £195,000 - £225,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY ** Jackson and Co are proud to present this excellent two bedroom apartment located within excellent proximity to Colchester's North Station and Colchester's General Hospital. The apartment is currently let for £1200PCM..."
*** Attention Investors *** Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer this well presented and modern apartment located on the ever popular ALBANY GARDENS area of Colchester. This ideal INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY is currently let to students and the new owner can look forward to new tenants............
**Attention Investors** Two bedroom terraced house in New Town Colchester with tenants in situ. This home is ideal for the town centre and town station. Are you looking for an investment that will earn you an income from day one?
"Opportunity to purchase a two bedroom apartment with a tenant in situ at Dutch Quarter Apartments. Property to be sold subject to existing tenancy which is producing £10,800 PA"
"** GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated in a popular location close to local amenities sits this well presented, two bedroom second floor apartment. Perfect for first time buyers the accommodation is ready to move straight into and..."
"Situated within a stone's throw of Colchester North Station Situated to the North of Colchester, is this immaculate one-bedroom apartment which is conveniently located a stone's throw away from North Station, with direct links to London Liverpool Street and beyond. The property also pro..."
"***GUIDE PRICE OF £190,000 TO £200,000***Located on a popular modern development in the Hythe area and within close proximity of Essex University, is this two bedroom apartment. Also within close proximity is Hythe Mainline Station which links to London Liverpool Street, alo..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to present to the market this two bedroom terraced property, situated in the highly sought after area of Stanway, within walking distance to a great selection of schools, shops and amenities as well as easy a..."
"An outstanding apartment, nestled in a small enclave. if you have never been, you may have never know it was there ! Walking distance to Colchester Castle Park and the City Centre, two bedrooms, some original features, landscaped grounds, parking. A must see"
"A simply stunning, second floor apartment ideally located at Station Square Colchester, within a stone's throw of Colchester Mainline train station. This stylish apartment is finished to an extremely high standard throughout and offers spacious and open plan living."
"** GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000 ** Located to the South side of Colchester's City Centre close to all local amenities sits this well presented, two bedroom top floor apartment. This would be an ideal purchase for first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder..."
"A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this spacious two bedroom apartment positioned on the fifth floor, set within a popular modern development in the Hythe, within close proximity of Essex University and a Mainline Station with links to London Liverpool Street. This stylish..."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom first floor flat situated to the west of Colchester´s city centre, offering convenient access to the A12, Colchester and Marks Tey train stations, local shops and amenities. The property, in our opinion, would make an ideal first time purc..."
Chain Free -- Two bedroom -- Ground floor flat -- Gas Central Heating -- Ensuite -- Allocated Parking -- Walking Distance to Colchester North Station (0.7mile)
"**Offers in Excess of £190,000* INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY achieving a 6% yield This spacious ground floor apartment offers a fantastic investment opportunity with tenants in situ. The property is located in the popular location of Apprentice Drive within close distan..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000*** **INVESTMENT ONLY** This delightful two bedroom second floor apartment is being sold with tenants in situation until September 2023 paying £1150pcm offering an annual yield of 7.2%. This property has no on-going chain."
"***GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000*** Palmer & Partners are delighted to offer to the market this Grade II Listed terraced cottage, situated within close proximity to Colchester's historic city centre, Castle Park and train station with mainline links to London Liverpool Stre..."
"**Guide Price of £190,000 - £200,000** Quartermaster House is a tasteful Victorian conversion on the edge of Colchester’s Town Centre, making up one of just six individual homes within a gated Mews setting and a share of the freehold upon completion. Location here is key with Abbey Field..."
Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer this well presented and modern apartment located on the ever popular ALBANY GARDENS area of Colchester. This ideal INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY is currently let to students and the new owner can look forward to new tenants already confirmed for the next.........
"*** Guide Price 190,000 - £200,000 *** Within easy reach of the town centre, located on the popular Abbey fields development is this well maintained and deceptively spacious two double bedroom ground floor apartment. The property comprises of an open plan living space/kitchen with integrat..."
"This two bedroom terraced property is situated on the east side of the city centre, close to a range of local amenities. Perfect for first time buyers, investors and those looking for a project to make their own mark."
"INVESTORS ONLY! ** OFFERS IN EXCESS OF £190,000 ** Offered for sale as investment only is this two bedroom, duplex apartment in the popular development close to Colchester town centre and the A12. Currently rented out for £820 pcm, generating a yield of 5.1% the property benefits from ..."
"GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000. Connells are delighted to bring to market this immaculately presented one bedroom apartment conveniently situated in the heart of Colchester."
"Occupying a superb position within close proximity to Colchester mainline railway station and city centre, a spacious two bedroom duplex apartment with accommodation arranged over two floors."
"Attention investors, with tenants already in situ this property makes for a perfect investment with a rental yield of 7.5%. A modern and well presented two bedroom first-floor apartment located within close proximity to Colchester's mainline station. This apartment benefits from having a..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £190,000 - £200,000 ** ** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** We are pleased to bring to the market this well presented, modern, one bedroom apartment situated just a stones throw away from the city centre and is within walking distance to the main line train station with links to Londo..."
"A truly exceptional two bedroom apartment positioned on the fifth floor, set in this popular modern development in the Hythe, within close proximity of Essex University and a Mainline Station with links to London Liverpool Street. This stylish property is presented to the market in excellent o..."
BRAND NEW Park Home (46'x12') | Residential development | Over 50s | Pet friendly | Fully furnished | Driveway | Shops and amenities nearby | Bottles gas | Great position | Corner plot | Semi retirement | Community living for like minded people | Coming soon
" Brand new 46’ x 12’ Stately Albion Chatsworth sited at Grange Farm Park. Grange Farm Park is a well-established family owned residential semi-retirement park estate just a half a mile from the historic walled town of Colchester in Essex. Comprising of 61 homes, this gently sloping es..."
"The perfect property for commuters, first time buyers or investors. Situated within walking distance of Colchester's North Station is this two double bedroom spacious apartment."
Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer this well presented and modern apartment located on the ever popular Hythe area of Colchester. This ideal INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY is currently let to students and the new owner can look forward to new tenants already confirmed for the next academic year.
Positioned just a just a short walk from Colchester North Station is this well presented and deceptively spacious three bedroom apartment
"Brand new residential park home within walking distance of shops and amenities with Double Glazing LPG radiator heating fully furnished with carpets and furniture. This property is ready to move in to. offering hallway, fully fitted Kitchen with appliances, Lounge, two Bedrooms ,Shower Room, Mai..."
"Where a beautiful historic exterior meets a thoroughly modern interior for a unique place to live on the doorstep of Colchester City Centre. From the outside Domitian Court looks like the kind of stately home that a royal would call home! However, inside, this apartment is contemporary ..."
INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY.  This first floor apartment with en suite to master bedroom is currently let at £875.00 pcm until  November 2023.  The property is situated conveniently to St Botolphs railway station and Colchester Town Centre.  
"**Guide Price £200,000 - £210,000** In a prime North Colchester position, this apartment is within easy reach of Colchester's anticipated Northern Gateway, soon to be home to an array of restaurants, leisure facilities and premium health club. It is also a served by an excellent bu..."
"Located on the sought after Grange Farm Park in the popular Old Heath area of the south easterly part of Colchester, is this BRAND NEW TWO BEDROOM DETACHED fully residential LUXURY PARK HOME for the over 50's. It benefits from allocated parking and a small rear garden area. The property is situat..."
"A two bedroom apartment set within this highly desirable development, within close proximity to Hythe Station and Essex University. The property was built to an exceptional specification and enjoys an array of bright, beautifully presented accommodation throughout. Highlights include two doubl..."
" ***GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 - £190,000*** Jackson and Co are delighted to bring to the market this immaculate top floor, two bedroom apartment with en-suite to master and located within easy access to Essex University and the Hythe railway station. The accommodation is generously prop..."
"A highly desirable move-in-ready cluster house situated in Highwoods on the outskirts of Colchester. With a spacious bedroom, a reception room, fitted kitchen, bathroom and two parking spaces, the property looks out onto a quiet road. "
"A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this well presented two bedroom apartment positioned on the fourth floor, set within a popular modern development in the Hythe, within close proximity of Essex University and a Mainline Station with links to London Liverpool Street. This styli..."
"Offered to the market is this well presented, two bedroom ground floor apartment, perfect for first time buyers looking to get onto the property ladder. The accommodation has been thoughtfully designed throughout and would be ideal for anyone looking to move straight in. Colchester's Town Centre ..."
"Guide Price £180,000 - £190,000. Two bedroom top floor flat with security entrance. The property has a welcoming entrance hallway with storage cupboard and doors to lounge and door to balcony, fitted kitchen integrated appliances, two double bedrooms and a modern bathroom. ..."
"This modern first floor apartment is situated in the heart of Colchester, offering excellent access to shops, restaurants and amenities, The property is currently being sold with a tenant in situ, achieving £950 pcm."
"Temme English are delighted to present this two bedroom ground floor apartment situated stones throw to Colchester's city Centre and within easy reach of an array of shops, restaurants and other local amenities"
INVESTMENT PURCHASE : CURRENTLY TENANTED UNTIL JANUARY 2024. We are delighted to offer for sale this two bedroom first floor apartment within close proximity to Colchester´s mainline railway station (London Liverpool Street approx. 1 hour) and Colchester General Hospital. The property boas...
"In the heart of Colchester town centre overlooking the bustling High Street, is this contemporary one bedroom modern apartment offering stylish accommodation and no onward chain."
Privileged with the instructions to market this fantastic investment opportunity is this modern third floor apartment located within close proximity to Essex University with its own sitting tenant currently paying £1100 per annum. This well presented apartment offers stunning views ...
" GUIDE PRICE OF £170,000 to £180,000 (FREEHOLD)
This one bedroom starter home/investment opportunity with gas fired central heating,  double glazed conservatory, private garden and two car parking spaces.  The property is conveniently situated o..."
"A well presented two bedroom ground floor retirement apartment. The accommodation comprises of a hallway, spacious lounge, fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms, an en-suite shower room, and main bathroom. The apartment benefits from front communal access, as well as private entrance at ..."
"Situated in one of the most popular rental locations in Colchester, this stunning apartment not only benefits from river views but has been maintained to a high standard by the current tenants. Locationally you couldn't be more well placed with the Hythe Train Station having links to London Liver..."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this fantastic *QUARTER HOUSE* is well-presented making the *IDEAL HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS*. Situated in a *SOUGHT-AFTER CUL-DE-SAC* off Enville Way the property is convenient for *LOCAL SCHOOLS*, various shops, *HIGHWOODS COUNTRY PARK* and the A12/A120."
"A rare opportunity has arisen to acquire this well presented two bedroom apartment positioned on the first floor, set within a popular modern development in the Hythe, within close proximity of Essex University and a Mainline Station with links to London Liverpool Street. This stylish property..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 - £190,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY **
* LET FOR £875 PCM * Jackson and Co are delighted to present this modern two bedroom apartment located in the ideal position for the commuter. Colchester's North station is approx 1 mile away and the A12 is also a s..."
"** Guide Price £180,000 - £190,000** **Investment opportunity currently achieving £1050 PCM until 2/2024** Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this two bedroom flat situated in the South of Colchester located conveniently close to Colchester&r..."
"Stunning luxury 2 bedroom apartment in the centre of town, offered for sale with no onward chain and breathtaking views over Colchester"
"Situated within walking distance of the city centre, a chance to acquire this one bedroom mid-terraced house offered for sale with NO ONWARD CHAIN. An early viewing is recommended to avoid any disappointment. "
"A spacious, light and airy two bedroom ground floor flat, within walking distance of the City Centre."
"A unique opportunity to purchase this recently refurbished two bedroom first floor apartment, within striking distance to Colchester's City Centre Station and station, all within walking distance. This outstanding apartment offers modern fitments throughout and benefits from a newly fitted kit..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £180,000 - £190,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY ** * YIELD 7.2% 7.6% * An excellent two bedroom, first floor apartment located in an ideal position for the Essex university. The property offers parking, two bathrooms and is easily located for all shops and amenities. Th..."
"Located in Colchesters historic City centre is this spacious, modern first floor apartment. This is an excellent investment opportunity with a tenant currently in situ and a monthly rental income of £950 PCM being achieve with a yield of over 6%."
Privileged with the instructions to market this fantastic investment opportunity is this modern second floor apartment located within close proximity to Essex University and is currently let out for £1025 PCM with a sitting tenant. This well presented apartment offers pleasant ...
"**GUIDE PRICE £180,000 - £190,000** Benedict House is situated to the south of Colchester city centre offering a fantastic outlook over Abbeyfields whilst being close to amenities and the train station with direct links to London Liverpool Street. This first floo..."
"***Guide price £180,000 - £190,000*** Connells are pleased to bring to the market this modern and stylish top-floor apartment, overlooking Colchester high street. Perfect for first-time buyers and investors - we highly recommend viewing this apartment before missing out. SOLD WITH NO ONWARD C..."
"***Guide Price £180,000-£195,000*** Connells Colchester are delighted to present this stunning High Street Apartment in the sought after 140 High Street development."
"Situated in an enviable position, within easy reach of Colchester city centre, and in walking distance of Colchester mainline railway station. This second-floor apartment benefits from accommodation comprising living room, kitchen, main bedroom with ensuite, further bedroom, family bathroom and J..."
"** SELLING WITH TENANTS IN SITU CURRENTLY PAYING £950 PCM ** Offered to the market with a tenant in situ or to potentially purchase with no onward chain sits this one bedroom, first floor apartment. Sat in a popular location you are close to all local amenities and only a short w..."
"A one bedroom top floor apartment situated on a modern development within walking distance of Colchester city centre, Colchester town station and Abbey Fields. "
"*** Attention Investors *** Saxons are offering for sale in the popular area of Stanway is this spacious bright and airy two double bedroom top floor apartment. The property is conveniently located for the A12, supermarkets, shops and is situated within desirable school catchments. The property....."
"A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Salter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town centre with all amenities and Castle Park. The De..."
"Located within close distance of Colchester North Station, the General Hospital, The A12 and Turner Rise retail park. This first floor two bedroom, two bathroom apartment is, in our opinion, the investment purchase and it comes with tenants in situ. £900pcm"
"GUIDE PRICE £185,000 - £200,000 A three bedroom ground floor apartment walking distance to North Station, Colchester Hospital and Turner Rise retail park. The property comes with a tenant in situ and will be sold as such"
"GUIDE PRICE £175,000----INVESTMENT ONLY ++++ RENTAL INCOME £750 PCM+++SHORTHOLD TENANCY AGREEMENT++++ SERVICE CHARGE INCLUDING GROUND RENT £1405.00 per year. Situated in the heart of Colchester town centre in the ever-popular Dutch Quarter is this spacious, 2-bedroom apartment."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £175,000 - £190,000 *** * INVESTMENT ONLY - TENANTS IN SITU * Situated within walking distance to the popular Essex university sits this well presented two bedroom apartment with balcony. The property benefits from two double bedrooms, en-suite, large open plan l..."
"Now available for residential buyers as well as investors. This ground floor apartment has a huge 979 year lease and is beautifully located for North Station, Colchester General Hospital, Turner Rise Retail, The A12 and the Town Centre. You must see this !!"
"Offering any first time purchaser or investor the opportunity to acquire a two bedroom terrace home, in the heart of Colchester's exciting city centre and a stones throw from Colchester's City centre station, offering connection trains to London Liverpool Street Station. Within walking distanc..."
"** Guide Price £175,000 - £190,000 ** A superbly presented and spacious top floor apartment situated in this sought after residential location within walking distance to the University of Essex and Hythe Railway Station which offers links to London Liverpool Street. This Stylish apart..."
A Luxurious apartment situated in the popular Hythe area. Ideal for both students and commuters the property benefits from being a short walk to the University of Essex and Hythe Station providing easy access to London Liverpool Street
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £175,000 - £190,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY **
* YIELD OF 7.2% - 7.6% * Jackson and Co are pleased to present this well presented two bedroom apartment situated within close proximity to Essex university and Hythe station. The apartment has two bathrooms along with a ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £175,000 - £190,000 *** Jackson and Co are proud to present this stunning two bedroom apartment with en-suite and family bathroom, the property also has the benefit of having a balcony as well as a large living area."
"INVESTMENT PROPERTY* Martin & Co are pleased to offer for sale this spacious Ground Floor, two bedroom apartment located within walking distance of Colchester town centre and town train station with allocated parking. *THIS PROPERTY IS CURRENTLY TENANTED UNTIL 29TH NOVEMBER 2023 AT £880PCM*"
"An impressive modern two bedroom apartment, located close to Colchester's Essex University. Offering spacious open plan living and is offered for sale with no onward chain. Viewings are highly recommended to appreciate this impressive spacious property"
"CALLING ALL INVESTORS!!! Occupying a fantastic location within close proximity of Colchester's mainline railway station, this spacious two double bedroom flat offers a great investment opportunity, with a tenant in situ already"
"*** INVESTMENT ONLY *** ** GUIDE PRICE OF £175,000 - £190,000 ** A two bedroom ground floor apartment situated within easy reach of the University of Essex and Hythe Railway Station. You will find two bathrooms and an open plan living area. The property has the potential of £115..."
"CHAIN FREE--Ideally located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy town centre is this beautifully presented, two-bedroom, retirement apartment. "
**CALLING ALL INVESTORS** This is a fantastic opportunity to purchase a buy to let with tenant in situ paying £825 per month
"A two bedroom ground floor apartment, located a short distance from Colchester's historic town centre, ideally suited to a first time buyer and investors alike. Offered for sale with no onward chain. This is a must view!"
** INVESTORS ONLY – TENANT IN SITU ** We are pleased to offer this investment opportunity – a large modern 2 bedroom flat near the University of Essex with tenants in situ until October 2023 
"Unsold, but is available at £180,000 FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 29TH MARCH AT 2PM. LIVE STREAMED VIA DEDMAN GRAY WEBSITE. BIDDING AVAILABLE BY TELEPHONE, PROXY AND ONLINE. ; RESIDENTIAL INVESTMENT: A VACANT FREEHOLD TERRACED HOUSE CONSIDERED TO BE IDEAL AS A BUY TO LET INVESTME..."
A period Grade II listed one bedroom maisonette with accommodation over two floors offering attractive period features in the heart of the City Centre.
"Northwood are pleased to market this two bedroom coach house situated in WheelWright Place Highwoods, the property benefits from being double glazed throughout as well as having an allocated parking space. Please note the property is currently being let on AST. Call tod..."
* * * CLOSE TO RAILWAY STATION and NO CHAIN * * * A two bedroom apartment with open plan living accommodation with allocated parking
"ATTENTION LANDLORDS Well presented and spacious two double bedroom apartment in Myland, North Colchester with an impressive open plan living/dining/kitchen arrangement and oversized garage. This property comes with a tenant in situ who has made this 'home'"
"Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this one bedroom top floor apartment, situated close to Colchester station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street, as well local shops, amenities and Colchester's historic city centre. Internally the well-presented accomm..."
"This luxurious one bedroom apartment is situated in the heart of Colchester's city centre, offering excellent access to shops and amenities. The property is beautifully finished with a modern open plan design, well equipped kitchen, generous living space and contemporary shower room."
"***INVESTMENT ONLY - TENANT IN SITU PAYING £800.00 PCM*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to the market this well-presented two bedroom top floor apartment, situated only a few minutes walk from Colchester's mainline railway station with links to London Liverpool Street. The propert..."
"** Guide Price £170,000 -£180,000** We are delighted to offer this one bedroom ground floor flat on the sought after Lakelands development in Stanway. Offered chain free with a tenant in situ, this would make an ideal investment opportunity. Located in Stanway, this home h..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £170,000 - £180,000** We are delighted to offer this fantastic investment opportunity, right next to Colchester’s mainline train station. Perfect for commuters but also offering great access to town centre, the A12, hospital and retail park, this two bed..."
"**Guide Price £170,000 - £180,000** A opportunity to acquire an excellent first floor apartment, offering two very generous bedrooms and recently decorated and complete with stylish grey carpet throughout. Accessed via a secure telephone entry system, Stuart House is based in the c..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £170,000 - £180,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated in the heart of Colchester sits this well presented, one bedroom first floor apartment. The well presented accommodation consists of an entrance hallway, spacious kitc..."
** NO ONWARD CHAIN ** Superb opportunity on this NEARLY NEW luxury apartment situated within the heart of Colchester City Centre. ***BEAUTIFULLY FINISHED*** Luxurious one bedroom apartment situated in sought after city centre location. Space & light have been optimised with an open plan design co...
"** GUIDE PRICE £170,000 - £180,000 ** Located close to Colchester City Centre is this excellent investment opportunity. Located on the top floor the property is well presented throughout with two bedrooms, En Suite shower room, bathroom and an underground parking space."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £170,000 - £190,000 ***
** INVESTMENT ONLY **
* YIELD OF - 7.4 % - 8.1 % * Jackson and Co are proud to represent this rarely available two bedroom apartment with two large terraces. Inside the property is of good condition with a large open plan living area, en-suit..."
"Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this spacious two bedroom apartment, situated a short distance from Colchester's city centre and North station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street. There are shopping facilities for day-to-day needs at Turner Rise Retail Park and..."
"Taylor Milburn are pleased to bring you this TWO BEDROOM ground floor apartment within walking distance of Colchester's town centre and mainline station. The property has a large fitted kitchen/ lounge area and allocated parking, offering no onward chain."
Positioned in a popular new development toward the South of Colchester is this spacious two bedroom ground floor apartment. This stylish home enjoys spacious living accommodation throughout and also has the added benefit of a carport
" This modern two bedroom ground floor apartment offers hallway, living room with patio doors out onto a large balcony, seperate fitted kitchen, two double bedrooms and a bathroom. This property also benefits from allocated parking, and is offered for sale with no onward chain."
"East Links Residential are delighted to bring to the market this Two Bedroom property located in West Colchester. Ideal investment opportunity with tenant currently in-situ and with no onward chain. Comprising of Two Bedrooms, Lounge, Kitchen, Bathroom and allocated parking."
"A TWO BEDROOM FOURTH FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT WITH RECENTLY REFURBISHED LIFT - CHAIN FREESalter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town centre with all amenities ..."
"Early viewing is advised of this beautifully presented two bedroom second floor flat situated in the Berechurch area of Colchester within 3 miles of Colchester's city centre. The property benefits from spacious and modern accommodation, as well as allocated parking space."
Recently refurbished one bedroom house on the outskirts of Colchester Town Centre. offered for sale with no onward chain. Ideal for first time buyers or Investors. This is a must view!
Situated within easy access of Essex University is this two bedroom ground floor apartment offered with no onward chain.
"This well presented two bedroom first floor apartment, within this attractive converted building within striking distance of the Town Centre & North Station. The property has been designed and built to an excellent specification, with superb attention to detail. Boasting allocated parking,..."
Two Bedroom First Floor Flat - Vacant Possession with No Onward Chain - Open Plan Kitchen/Living Room - Main Bathroom Serves Bedroom Two - En-Suite to Bedroom One - Juliet Balcony to Living Room - One Allocated Car Park Space - Viewings by Appointment Only
INVEST IN THIS. An truly impressive maisonette currently let on an assured shorthold tenancy but could be bought with vacant possession. This home could also lend itself subject to any consent to be converted to a very large three bedroom. Own garden too !
"What a buy !! Two impressive bedrooms, generous lounge, separate kitchen, full bathroom. All this is a location close to ever popular Abbey Fields. What's not to love? Call now before you miss out. CHAIN FREE"
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £165,000 - £180,000 *** Jackson and Co are happy to introduce to the market this excellent, top floor, two bedroom apartment located a short distance to Colchester city centre and Colchester & Hythe station. Benefiting from a spacious and light lounge/diner this ..."
"Boydens are delighted to bring to market this two-bedroom, first floor maisonette, that can be found just off St John's Close, which is to the North of Colchester within easy reach of the A12."
"..ATTN FIRST TIME BUYERS! EXCELLENT ACCESS TO A12 AND COLCHESTER TOWN BUS ROUTES - Take a look at this OPEN PLAN 2 bedroom first floor flat in Sayers Court Stanway, and you will see it is perfect for FIRST TIME BUYERS and INVESTORS - Located in the popular residential area of Stanway in West Col..."
"Located in Colchester City Centre is this one bedroom ground floor apartment. In modern condition the property comprises of a large open plan kitchen and living area, modern bathroom suite and spacious bedroom. The property is a short walk to the nearby train station and sits in the heart o..."
** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY ** Tenant in situ presently achieving £700.00 per calendar month. Superb investment opportunity on this NEARLY NEW luxury apartment situated within the heart of Colchester City Centre. Luxurious one bedroom apartment situated in sought after city centre location. Perfec...
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT* is *WELL-PRESENTED THROUGHOUT* making the *PERFECT HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS* with early viewing recommended. Situated in a *POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC* the property is ideal for *LOCAL SHOPS*, schools, *BUS ROUTES* and the A12/A120."
"*Guide Price £160,000 - £170,000* *OFFERED WITH TENANTS IN SITU* Immaculately presented and modern one bedroom ground floor apartment with a private rear garden. Built only four years ago, this property is stylish, modern and located in a convenient lo..."
"***Guide price £160,000 - £170,000*** A two bedroom top floor flat which is offered with a tenant in situ. This property offers a modern fitted kitchen, bathroom, one allocated parking space and visitor spaces."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £160,000 - £170,000 *** Jackson and Co welcome this two bedroom top floor apartment to the market, the home offers a spacious living area and is within easy reach of local shops and amenities. "
"two bedroom ground floor apartment situated in the popular Hythe Area of Colchester. Living/dining area with contemporary fitted kitchen in open-plan, L-shape arrangement. Integrated appliances include an induction hob, electric oven, and extractor fan. Two double bedrooms, one with en-suite d..."
"**GUIDE PRICE £160,000 - £170,000** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY. This two bedroom first floor maisonette is located to the South of Colchester within 2.5 miles of the city centre and train station with direct links to London Liverpool Street. The acommodation compris..."
"***£160,000 - £170,000***INVESTMENT ONLY - TENANT IN SITU PAYING £800.00 PCM***BEING SOLD AS PART OF A BUY TO LET PORTFOLIO*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this two bedroom, first floor apartment, situated to the south of Colchester within easy a..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £160,000 - £170,000 ** Offered to the market with no onward chain and situated in a popular location within walking distance to the Hythe Train Station, local amenities and only a short drive away from Colchester's bustling City Centre. The accommodation consists of an ..."
"This two bedroom ground floor apartment comes to the market chain free and is located in ever popular North Colchester, ideal for Colchester North Station, Colchester General Hospital and the A12. With open plan living space and allocated parking this is definitely one to see"
"INVESTORS ONLY. A two double bedroom first floor maisonette, in need of some modernization. There is also a private rear garden to the property. Please call to arrange a viewing."
"INVESTOR SALE.. An attractive one bedroom ground floor maisonette in this delightful part of South Colchester with a tenant in situ. This property has two designated parking spaces, it's own very generous private garden, 957 year lease and is a ready to go investment. What's not to love?"
"GUIDE PRICE £160,000---£170,000--- This spacious apartment is well presented throughout with an open plan living/kitchen area, a double bedroom, a family bathroom and a private west facing balcony with views over the River Colne."
"VIEWING REFERENCE: MC0527 - Located in the popular location of the Hythe, we are pleased to bring to market this well presented two bedroom top floor apartment. The home offers a spacious lounge diner, fitted kitchen, bathroom & is walking distance to the Hythe Railway Station & c..."
"Guide Price £160,000 - £170,000 This one-bedroom top-floor apartment is located in the heart of Colchester city centre, offering easy access to all the amenities and attractions the city offers. The apartment features a bright, airy living room with large windows, providing plenty of natural ligh..."
"Harris + Wood are delighted to offer for sale, this very well presented and good size one bedroom apartment, situated off Mill Road to the north of Colchester, providing excellent A12, Station and Hospital access. The apartment is situated on the second floor, and offers a large entran..."
"***Guide price £160,000 - £180,000**** Connells Colchester are very pleased to offer this fantastic INVESTMENT ONLY opportunity with a current tenant in situ until July 2023."
"Two Bed Willerby Sheraton Elite (42x14) The Willerby Sheraton is one of the most sought after holiday homes on the market. This model exudes country house warmth at every turn, with its soft tartan interiors and walnut tones. This holiday home features a spacious environment throughout, and e..."
"Saxons Lettings & Management are delighted to offer for sale this modern, spacious and well presented top floor apartment which is ideally located for access to The University of Essex. Currently tenanted and achieving £700.00 pcm, this is an excellent investment opportunity not to be missed."
"** GUIDE PRICE OF £150,000 TO £160,000 **Perfectly located in the ever popular Highwoods development to the north of Colchester, is this 'Chain Free' one bedroom ground floor maisonette. Offering an abundance of local amenities right on your doorstep, including Tesco superma..."
**No Onward Chain** Town centre living with this well presented One bedroom apartment which is offered for sale with no onward chain
"** GUIDE PRICE OF £150,000 TO £160,000 **This luxury two bedroom apartment, is situated in the prestigious development of The Mill Apartments, providing excellent access to Colchester City Centre and local amenities.The accommodation comprises of; entran..."
"Stunning one bedroom apartment, in the heart of Colchester City Centre, offering luxury living. This is a must view starter home!"
"Spacious two bedroom, two bathroom apartment located in the popular Solus Development to the South of Colchester's City Centre. This is a must view! NO ONWARD CHAIN"
"** GUIDE PRICE £150,000 - £160,000 ** Harris + Wood Chesterwell are delighted to offer for this exceptionally well presented one bedroom first floor apartment, situated within a short walk of North Station with its mainline links to London, Colchester general Hospital and the A12. Fu..."
"Situated in The Hythe area of Colchester, this spacious two bedroomed, second floor apartment is an absolute gem with its proximity to Colchester city centre and the University of Essex. Accommodation comprises large open-plan reception room allowing plenty of space for lounging and dining,..."
"*Guide Price £150,000-£160,000* Ideal first time purchase or investment offered with no onward chain. This top floor two bedroom modern apartment can be found to the east of the city just off the Mersea Road and benefits from an allocated parking space and doubl..."
Now tenanted at £850.00pcm as advised by the vendor and available only for buy to let landlords. A sound investment for you just yards from Colchester North Mainline Station?
"**Attention Investors and first time buyers** I am delighted to bring to the market this beautifully presented and very spacious one bedroom ground floor apartment. It's been beautifully looked after by the current owner. It is in the prime location of St Peters Street, which is situat..."
"** BUYER INCENTIVE ** THE SELLER WILL PAY TWO YEARS SERVICE CHARGE FROM DATE OF COMPLETION. We are pleased to bring to the market this third floor apartment in the sought after Mill Apartments development, within walking distance of Colchester town centre and Castle Park. The property benefits ..."
"Jackson and Co welcome to the market this two bedroom apartment which is located a short distance from Colchester city centre, the apartment is walking distance to local shops and amenities and has a spacious lounge, we strongly avoid a viewing to avoid missing out."
" **GUIDE PRICE £150,000 - £160,000** We are delighted to offer this fantastic investment opportunity. With a good EPC rating, 137 year lease, this good sized one bedroom apartment has a tenant in situ paying £820pcm until September 2023. "
"**NO ONWARD CHAIN** Ideally located apartment, situated in Colchester's town centre with its array of shops, restaurants, amenities and town train station. Ideal first time purchase."
"*Guide Price £150,000-£160,000* An opportunity to purchase a two bedroom second floor apartment, positioned at Colchester Hythe and therefore offering itself as the ideal investment or first time purchase opportunity. Requiring some tender love and care throughout but offering a fa..."
"Looking for that perfect investment close to Colchester City Centre, then this fantastic one bedroom maisonette is for you! Just a short walk into the City & Colchester train station, this modern property boasts great size accommodation and includes off road parking. Early viewing advised."
"PUBLIC NOTICE – The vendor has been in receipt of an offer of £152,000 subject to contract for the above property. Anyone wishing to place a higher offer must do so before legal exchange of contracts. Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased ..."
"*Offers over £150,000* Buy To Let Investors! Modern 2 bedroom flat in North Colchester with tenant in situ"
"Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and well presented one bedroom apartment which is located in popular Hythe area of the City. Perfectly positioned for access to the University of Essex, City Centre and local amenities, the property is an ideal investment......"
"Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this spacious and well presented one bedroom apartment which is located in popular Hythe area of the City.Perfectly positioned for access to the University of Essex, City Centre and local amenities, the property is an ideal first time or........"
"CHAIN FREE: Superbly located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy town centre is this spacious well maintained, ONE BEDROOM, RETIREMENT RESIDENCE with a DINING AREA and JULIETTE BALCONY. The property has also just been freshly painted and has had ne..."
"CHAIN FREE: Ideally located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy town centre, is this spacious and well-maintained one-bedroom retirement residence, providing accommodation for the over 60's"
"CHAIN FREE: Ideally located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy town centre is this spacious, well-maintained, one-bedroom, retirement residence, providing accommodation for the over 60's"
" **INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY** Located in the popular Hythe area within easy access to Essex University and The Hythe railway station accessing London Liverpool Street, is this one double bedroom contemporary style second floor apartment. The property is currently let for £825 pcm giving a gr..."
"NO CHAIN! This well presented modern first floor apartment has 964 years remaining on the lease, is situated within close proximity of the city centre & North Station. The property offers spacious accommodation, one bedroom, allocated parking and would be an ideal first time purchase or investment."
"**GUIDE PRICE £140,000 - £145,000** Located in Colchester City Centre is this one bedroom first floor apartment. REF(COS220295)"
"*** INVESTMENT ONLY ***
** GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000 ***
A superbly presented one bedroom third floor apartment situated along the banks of the River Colne and being within easy reach of the University of Essex. By nature of its location the property would make an excellent inv..."
Offered For Sale with no onward chain is this one bedroom first floor apartment located to the south of Colchester in a cul-de-sac position and offered with a 25% of the Freehold.
"Set in the prestigious Colchester Country Park, Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this two bedroom luxury leisure home measuring 40ft x 13ft, located to the west of Colchester, just off of the A12. The holiday park provides excellent access to the historic city centre with ..."
"LEASEHOLD (90 YEARS REMAINING) COUNCIL TAX BAND A We are delighted to offer to the market this wonderful 1-bedroom second floor flat on Hunting Gate, Colchester. The property offers a well-adapted layout and comfortable accommodation supporting a wide array of ind..."
INVESTMENT ONLY------RENTAL INCOME £736 pcm-----SERVICE CHARGE £675 pa----GROUND RENT £50 pa----SHORTHOLD TENANCY AGREEMENT-- LEASE LENGTH 91 YEARS---- This rarely avaliable one bedroom ground floor apartment can be found in the popular Claremont Heights development which is within easy reach of ...
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000 ***
*** ATTENTION INVESTORS ***
Located within ideal proximity to Essex university is this one bedroom apartment. Having a balcony and an open plan living area, the property is also currently let for £850pcm giving a yield of 7.2%."
LANDLORDS LOOK NO FURTHER !! This two bedroom apartment comes ready to go with tenants in situ and a garage. Located just on the edge of the town centre and with excellent access to two train stations and the A12. What's not to like? Call to view before it goes
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000 ***
*** INVESTMENT ONLY *** Situated within walking distance to Essex University is this spacious one bedroom apartment, the property is conveniently located for Hythe Station, local shops and amenities. This excellent one bedroom apartment featu..."
"A stylish apartment just yards from the Colchester City centre located on an attractive walkway and once seen, we think you will be smitten. High ceilings, open plan living/dining/kitchen space with modern fittings, generous double bedroom and shower room"
"A one bedroom flat situated on the ""shoppers"" level of the complex which gives great access to the town without using the stairs or lift. Salter Court is a popular over 60's retirement complex ideally located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy tow..."
"*** INVESTMENT ONLY ***
** TENANT IN SITU ** ***GUIDE PRICE £140,000 - £150,000*** Located on The Hythe Quay Waterfront with views over The River Colne and situated on the top floor, this luxury one bedroom apartment benefits from having a good size balcony overlooking the river, open-..."
"GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000
*** INVESTMENT ONLY *** Located in the popular Hythe location is this immaculate one bedroom property within easy reach of local amenities and the Essex university."
"This second floor apartment is situated in the popular Hythe area of Colchester and could be an ideal investment opportunity. The property offers well presented accommodation, one bedroom and there is a communal parking area."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000 *** Located within walking distance to The Essex University and being currently let for £875pcm until October 2023 and has a yield of 7% - 7.5%. This property is being offered with no on-going chain. "
"*** INVESTMENT ONLY *** Ideally located within easy reach of The University Of Essex is this one double bedroom first floor apartment offered with no onward chain. The property benefits from spacious open plan living accommodation, cloakroom family bathroom plus allocated parking . "
"Two Bed ABI Ingleton (40x13) 2023 With a fabulous, fresh layout and designer detailing, The Ingleton lets you enjoy a space that’s chic and quite unique. With an inviting entrance that opens up into the breakfast bar, while touches of floral fabric add oodles of cosy charm. From ..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £140,000 - £150,000 ***
*** INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY *** Situated within easy reach of the University of Essex and Hythe Railway Station is this good size one bedroom fifth floor apartment, currently let on an Assured Shorthold Tenancy for £900pcm offering an annua..."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £135,000 - £150,000 *** ** INVESTMENT ONLY ** Jackson and Co are proud to present this third floor one bedroom apartment situated in the Hythe area. The property benefits from a large balcony, lounge as well as a double bedroom. "
"Boydens are delighted tobring to market this one bedroom, first floor apartment, situated within short walking distance of Colchester's historic city centre and would ideally suit a first time buyer, or buy to let investor. The property had recently been decorated and carpetted throughout."
 This substantial one bedroom second floor apartment can be found in the heart of Colchester's bustling High Street.
"**GUIDE PRICE OF £135,000 - £145,000** A very well presented one bedroom apartment, benefiting from river views and having allocated parking. The property is located on the fourth floor and is currently tenanted, paying 875pcm giving a total yield of 7% - 7.5%."
"A 1 Bedroom ground floor flat with a low maintenance private garden, non allocated parking and external storage. This property presents an ideal opportunity for a 1st time buyer or potential investor."
"*** GUIDE PRICE £135,000 - £150,000 *** ** INVESTMENT ONLY ** A well presented one bedroom fourth floor apartment located in the popular Hythe area, the apartment is walking distance to Essex University and local shops, the accommodation is of good condition and offers a balcony and s..."
"***GUIDE PRICE £135,000 - £145,000*** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to present to the market this one bedroom ground floor apartment, ideally situated being close to Colchester station with mainline links to London Liverpool Street, as w..."
"GUIDE PRICE £130,000 (LEASEHOLD)
This one bedroom ground floor maisionette features double glazing and a reserved car parking space to the rear.  The property is held on a 999 Lease and is offered for sale on a chain free basis, keys are availalble for viewing...."
*Investors Only* Leaders are delighted to offer this two bedroom apartment for student only let. Situated close to the university is this well-kept and spacious two bedroom apartment. You have the local train station only a stone's throw away along with the town centre and a...
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £130,000 - £140,000 *** ** INVESTMENT ONLY ** Located within ideal proximity to Essex university is this one bedroom apartment. The property has a balcony and a open plan living area. The property is also currently let for £825pcm giving a yield of 7.07% - 6.6%. "
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this charming *OVER 65's FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT* provides *IDEAL ACCOMMODATION* with a *COMFORTABLE LOUNGE* opening onto the *COMMUNAL GARDENS* and being convenient for *LOCAL SHOPS*, Highwoods Country Park and *BUS SERVICES*. An early viewing is highly recommended."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £130,000 - £150,000 *** Jackson and Co are proud to present this one bedroom first floor apartment located within easy access to the Essex University and a short distance to Colchester centre. The property offers parking."
"***INVESTMENT ONLY - TENANT IN SITU PAYING £695.00 PCM***BEING SOLD AS PART OF A BUY TO LET PORTFOLIO*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this one bedroom, first floor apartment, situated on the popular Highwoods development to the north of Colchester with great..."
"** GUIDE PRICE £130,000 - £140,000 ** Located in the Hythe is this excellent investment opportunity offered with no onward chain. Located on the second floor the modern home has bright open plan, kitchen and living area with a spacious bedroom and bathroom. The property al..."
"GUIDE PRICE £130,000--£135,000--INVESTMENT ONLY------RENTAL INCOME £570 pcm-----SERVICE CHARGE £696 pa----GROUND RENT £50 pa----SHORTHOLD TENANCY AGREEMENT-- LEASE LENGTH 91 YEARS---- This rarely avaliable one bedroom ground floor apartment can be found in the popular Claremont Heights developmen..."
"**** Attention Investors **** Saxons are delighted to offer this modern one bedroom apartment which is perfectly located for access to the University of Essex, City Centre, supermarkets and local amenities. The property would make an ideal investment purchase and is currently tenanted."
"Saxons Estate Agents are delighted to offer this spacious apartment ideally positioned for access to the University of Essex. This ideal ***Investment Property*** is currently tenanted and benefits from a large double bedroom, study/nursery room, modern fitted kitchen & bathroom."
This one bedroom first floor maisonette can be found on the ever popular Bergholt Road which has direct access to Colchesters North Station.
"**Guide Price £125,000 - £135,000** Offered for sale with no onward chain, Palmer & Partners are pleased to offer to the market this one bedroom apartment, built in 2018 and situated a short distance to Colchester city centre which offers a range of shopping facilities, bars..."
"Occupying a superb position within walking distance of central Colchester, this established one bedroom first floor flat, offered For Sale, with no ongoing chain."
"A RE-DECORATED AND RE CARPETED ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE THIRD FLOOR WITH JULIET BALCONY Salter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town ..."
Situated within walking distance of the Essex University is this well presented two bedroom apartment which currently has tenants in situ
"Offers over £125,000.00 - Priced to sell ground floor maisonette that can be bought with the tenant in situ or bought to live in yourself. (Rent £730pcm). Close to town, town station and with allocated parking. CHAIN FREE"
"**Calling All Investors** Situated in the popular Highwoods area of North Colchester, is this well presented one bedroom maisonette which is for sale to INVESTMENT BUYERS ONLY!"
IDEAL STUDENT LET - Situated within walking distance of the Essex University is this well presented two bedroom apartment which currently has tenants in situ
This retirement property is situated a short distance from Colchester's historic city centre and the well renowned Castle Park.
A spacious and beautifully maintained one bedroom apartment enjoying wonderful views over St Mary's with and nestled in a popular retirement development in the heart of Colchester Town Centre. The property enjoys excellent sized accommodation throughout and great communal facilities ...
"A RE- CARPETED ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE THIRD FLOOR Salter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town centre with all amenities and Castle..."
"A ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FOURTH FLOOR. Salter Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 80 properties arranged over 5 floors each served by lift, being conveniently situated to the town centre with all amenities and Castle Park. The ..."
"East Links Residential are delighted to bring to the market this One Bedroom Ground Floor Flat, located ideally for Colchester North Station and Colchester General Hospital. Being offered with no onward chain and with tenant in situ."
"Saxons are delighted to offer for sale this well presented and spacious apartment located in the ever desirable St Marys area close to Colchester City Center. Residing in this desirable retirement development, the property is on offer with no onward chain and is perfectly located for access to......"
This ground floor studio maisonette is situated in a desirable location and boasts a peaceful outlook over a communal garden. The property has been rented out for a number of years and some modernisation is required. There are two windows with provide the maisonette with natural light.
Wonderful 2 bedroom apartment in the Castellum Grange development. The price advertised represents purchasing a 50% share of the home
"*Sold with Tenant in Situ* Currently let and achieving a gross rental yield of 6% this first floor studio flat is available for investment purchase. Located in the sought after area of Highwoods to the north of Colchester, the property offers fantastic access to the A12. H..."
"Palmer & Partners are delighted to present to the market this one bedroom, first floor flat, situated to the north of Colchester in the sought after area of Highwoods having excellent access to local amenities including Tesco superstore, A12/A120, Colchester General hospital and Colchester Bu..."
"An excellent investment opportunity has arisen to purchase this generously sized studio apartment positioned favourably to the North of Colchester and within striking distance of an array of excellent local amenities, including Colchester's Northern Gateway and Leisure facilities, Ge..."
Situated within easy access of Colchester city centre is this one bedroom second floor apartment for the over 60's.
"***INVESTMENT ONLY - TENANT IN SITU PAYING £560.00 PCM*** Palmer & Partners are pleased to present to the market this one bedroom, first floor studio flat, situated to the north of Colchester in the sought after area of Highwoods, having excellent access to local amenities in..."
"CHAIN FREE: Superbly located within easy reach of the popular Crouch Street shopping parade and Colchester's busy town centre is this spacious, well-maintained, one-bedroom, retirement residence. Service Charge: £2362.78 pa --- Ground Rent £395.00 Length of Lease 109 years (125 from 2005)"
A spacious and well presented one bedroom apartment enjoying wonderful views over St Mary's with and nestled in a popular retirement development in the heart of Colchester Town Centre. The property enjoys excellent sized accommodation throughout and great communal facilities including living r...
"*Tenants in-situ* This well presented and spacious studio apartment is now available to view. Located in the preferred North side of Colchester is this studio apartment. Desired for its great access to the A12, brilliant transport links, and close to amenities, it should hav..."
"**For Sale By Public Auction 19th April 2023 09:00 AM To inspect the legal documents for this property go to our website to download the legal pack** A Vacant Two Bedroom Mid Terrace House Freehold Guide Price = £90,000+ Location The property is situated..."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this excellent *FIRST FLOOR STUDIO APARTMENT* would make the *PERFECT HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS*. Situated in the *SOUGHT AFTER HIGHWOODS AREA* the property is convenient for *LOCAL SHOPS*, Highwoods Country Park, *COLCHESTER NORTH STATION* and the A12/A120."
"Offered with *NO ONWARD CHAIN* this fantastic *GROUND FLOOR STUDIO APARTMENT* has been *REFURBISHED THROUGHOUT* making the *IDEAL HOME FOR FIRST TIME BUYERS*. The property is situated conveniently for *LOCAL SHOPS*, Highwoods Country Park, *COLCHESTER NORTH STATION* and the A12/A120."
NO CHAIN! We are delighted to present this one DOUBLE bedroom over 55's retirement flat situated just off the popular Ipswich Road and nestled close to an array of local amenities and bus routes into the City Centre
"Over 55's One bedroom retirement apartment, a matter of minutes away from Colchester's historic town centre. Offered for sale with no onward chain. This is a must view!"
"Well presented two double bedroom pent house apartment offered with NO ONWARD CHAIN.This Property benefits from City views, en-suite to Master, open plan living accommodation, allocated parking, within walking distance to local schools, shops & amenities."
"*** GUIDE PRICE OF £60,000 - £70,000 ***
** OPTION TO BUY AT FULL PRICE ** Jackson and Co welcome to the market this shared ownership two bedroom apartment, the stake on offer is 35%. Inside you will find the apartment is in good order and has the benefit of a parking space."
"For sale by online auction, a studio flat located on the ground floor. Some modernisation required - opportunity to add value. Vacant possession. Long leasehold - unexpired term approx. 80 years."
"Unsold, but is available at £10,000 FOR SALE BY PUBLIC AUCTION ON WEDNESDAY 29TH MARCH AT 2PM. LIVE STREAMED VIA DEDMAN GRAY WEBSITE. BIDDING AVAILABLE BY TELEPHONE, PROXY AND ONLINE. ; LAND INVESTMENT: A VACANT FREEHOLD PARCEL OF LAND SIDING ONTO THE STREET IN A RESIDENTIAL AREA MEASURING ..."
